Your challenge is Hearts and Glitter....the more the better..run with it...felt hearts, paper hearts, fabric hearts, chipboard, chunky glitter, fine glitter doesn't matter. YOU HAVE TO USE WHAT YOU ALREADY HAVE! no buying. after all this is a using up your crap challenge blog :)
Speaking of the announcements, she handed me hers and said I will get you all the addresses I have so you can fill them out. bawhahahahahahaha
I have to tell you that no such undertaking has been received, and that consequently this party is at war with Murdoch.
A few days ago, I finally spotted Dories book, which I perused at breakfast, daily. I have been baking from the book, almost every week. Certainly, this is the logical place to find my recipe and indeed, it was. I have made several recipes from Dorie and almost everyone has been an unqualified success. In my most humble opinion, this too was a major success. I love these cookies.
tonight i tried to leave some comments on a coupla fellow blogonaut's sites, and much to my chagrin, i noticed a new (for me) anti-robot text that blogger is making us type before we can post a comment. is anyone else experiencing frustration with this ? I CANT READ THE SHITE !!!!
Nov 29 – Crocodile Rock Café – Allentown, PA (W/Cobra Starship)
So, without further ado...here's an excerpt from a contract that came across my desk this summer. (A relevant bit of info: the term of this contract is 3 years.)
The reasons why you should not be an enterpreneur. these are the simple three things:
shared many joys with you this season. I
Our trips to India keep them grounded to reality. They see the glittering malls, the gated communities then they see people sleeping on side walks with their families. ‘Why don’t they have a house? We want to help when we grow up! How can we help?’ I hope they grow up to feel people’s pain and as Sean said to me all those years ago, hope they never get used to the sleeping families on the side walks. Well, that is the HOPE. I am building a cathedral, so time will tell!
I was met at Burridge by Martyn Barnett, who along with several other of our players, had finished putting up the goal nets. He had something to tell me.
On October 26, 2001, US President George W. Bush enacted the USA PATRIOT Act. The bill was in direct response to the terrorist attacks that occurred on September 11. The goal of the Act was to reduce restrictions on law enforcement and government officials when investigating criminal activity. It gave international law organizations the right to probe and search citizen’s e-mail, medical, financial and personal records. Some of the main sections of the law enacted restrictions on foreign intelligence gathering, expanded the Secretary of the Treasury’s authority to regulate financial transactions, and broadened immigration laws in regards to detaining and deporting immigrants suspected of terrorism-related acts. The bill was passed by a wide margin in the US Congress. It was supported by some people and seen as an attack on civil liberties by others.
Ever hear of anything like that? My OWN cake?
* If you're hungry, ask Mom, "How can I help you with dinner?" I told them I would have e-mealz in the cabinets for them to be able to prepare if I was going to be out of pocket.
Randy still does have a kick ass theme, then again so does Mark. I have been looking forward to this match the most tonight.
The Blue Light Project
smiling through sugar-coated lies
If you are looking to require a luxury charter yacht job, it will help when you would consider first the way to effectively land such a position. It might also help when you would condition yourself into adjusting to the daily needs as well as of living on the water.
"Lady Flo", as she is also known, is famous for her pumpkin scones. I've cooked them and many other things from this cookbook. It's full of lovely home cooked recipes for meals and baked goods. There's no pretty pictures, just recipes chocked full of homely goodness. There's also a section at the back full of home hints. By the way, Lady Flo was the wife of Queensland's longest serving State Premier, Sir Joh Bjelke-Petersen.
We thought it was funny to put the babies facing each other over the lake weekend for the fourth. Mike and our friend Danny started narrating for them as if they were fighting. "I will stun you with my ninja moves!" We were having a good laugh over it.
What’s your favorite thing about April?
This is the point where we learn a very important lesson:
The floor was dirt. Only the wealthy had something other than dirt. Hence the saying "dirt poor." The wealthy usually had slate floors that would get wet and slippery, especially in winter. So they spread thresh (straw) on the floor to help and stop them slipping.
The Essie is a pretty good match colorwise to the Finger Paints; it's just a bit darker. The Models Own is brighter and a tad more yellow-toned than the other two. Here they are again, left to right—Models Own, Finger Paints, Essie, Finger Paints:
It tilts a little.
Friday: Weight day. I did level 2 of Jillian Michael’s Shred with Weights. It was tough! I love using the kettle bell for my total body weight workout. I was sore the next day, which I have to admit doesn’t happen that often anymore. And I was sore in some weird places like the muscles in my back.
From what I can tell, it couldn't have happened to a nicer guy.
So how can this help? As parent’s teachers and leaders there is a simple 3 step process you can apply when with your children, charges or team:-
In the last few years I have often also pulled a sickie the following day as well, reasoning that most true illnesses don’t last only one day and thinking that, as a result, I was more likely to be believed.
2 cm knob of fresh root ginger (grated)
I will randomly draw a lucky winner via Random.org on Wednesday, November 16, 2011. Good luck!
It was refreshing.
Please leave a direct link to your blog post,
This is how the argument is formed—it seems on face value that Buffet’s employees in his office pay more in federal income taxes than he does, so it is hard to deny without the facts readily available.
Sometime the best thing to do is quietly let go and move on. You can’t force a flower to bloom. To know when to go away and when to come closer is the key to any lasting relationship.
There is also great news for students wanting to print from their laptops to library printers.
Thursday - green day:
Annualized Return: +29.00%
One of the many tricks to self control in the culinary program is bringing gum. Yes, I bring my Trident White gum every time I attend class so I don’t overindulge myself. I try the many creations in class but I watch the portions being I’m trying to maintain my current goals for the year which will be in upcoming blog. A true chef will try all of his artwork. One should always carry passion and depth in their work. Being, I’m a perfectionist every product must come out looking and tasting like the Mona Lisa. I take this profession seriously and want to excel to the very top. Big World here I come! Enjoy the pictures:)
The lovely & extremely thin woman who is my “counselor” has provided me with all kinds of directions. Oh my do I dislike being directed. Tell me I have to eat a certain thing and not to eat other certain things and you will find me at 7-11.
Lysius got to the place he was by self-assertion. He paid much to start with. In joining the military, he worked p through the ranks and was the envy of his fellow soldiers. I am reminded of the comment concerning Abraham in Romans 4:2.
In a stand mixer using the dough hook attachment, combine the flour, two tablespoons of olive oil, the yeast mixture, the water and the kosher salt. Mix on medium until the dough is smooth and elastic, about five minutes.
First place went to an elephant photographed in a zoo in Utah.
A One of my influences would be my parents; my dad was an amateur photographer. In addition to that, he used to draw a lot; he's an architect.
Sam Hurst is a Rapid City filmmaker.
“Mr. President, we have a situation.”
Just kidding! I love motherhood. Wouldn't trade it. My house is often filled with little ones, and chicken is usually something you can bet at least half of them will like. (Coincidentally, my toddler decided to boycott chicken the last time I made these.) I think most moms would say they prefer baked recipes instead of fried ones, even though usually the fried stuff tastes so much better (check out this CFA knock-off recipe, it looks amazing). But behold, a tasty baked chicken nugget recipe!
operation and recovered
At the end of the day, I was not among the folks selected to go oversees. But I would have gone. For $100K to pay off all those student loans and credit card debt and come back with a fresh new start?
First off, I want to thank our emergency services and for all the citizens who protected their own territories - you have all done amazing work in the face of tremendous adversity.
The cyber competition team was established in August 2011. In the past, cadets from senior-level classes and the cyber warfare club competed in cyber competitions, but this is the first year the Academy has had a dedicated cyber team, Carlisle said.
so do take it slower.
I wish others could understand that I prefer one-on-one or small group interactions versus “going out.”
I received an email today from my cousin, it said this.
Pair Most Likely to Stay Best Friends Till They’re 80: Zuzana and Karou (Daughter of Smoke and Bone by Laini Taylor) and Emerson/Lillian (Hourglass by Myra McEntire)
Marianne wrapped her toned, bronze legs around mine; feeling her softness, her touch, her love invade me. I smiled in the darkness, and sipped the whiskey. It was moments like this that made life worth all the trouble. To find yourself ensconced in a moment of passion–without fear, without reservation. Able to forget the past, and live in the moment.
Nobelprize.org
My first Glymm box has arrived! I have to say this is the best present. Every month I get a box of beauty samples, I've subscribed to Glymm and Loose Button. I'm not a girly girl by any means but these boxes pretty much make me squeal every time they arrive, they are a special present just for me! I've already gotten two Loose Button boxes but this is my first Glymm box.
Just after Christmas, I went into my local Waterstones and saw that there was a half-price sale. I picked up My Dear I Wanted To Tell You because it looked interesting, and didn’t click for some time that it was by Louisa, and that Louisa is one of the History Girls. (Yes, I really am that dense!) I began to read it last Friday, and it was so good that, when that evening we had a power cut, I carried on reading by the light of a candle.
This marathon training plan is not for a beginner. The plan’s authors recommend that, before beginning the marathon training program, the runner have a 3 month base of 25 miles/week and be able to run 15 miles. I actually began training for the RLRF training plan in late November. I gradually increased my mileage over seven weeks until I was capable of running enough to participate in the plan.
But now I need never eat alone again. A website has been launched to help women like me. We can meet up and eat together as surely eating with anyone has got to be better than eating alone. No men though, men are dangerous and don’t need to find each other for meals they can just buy hunks of meat and rip them apart with their bare hands. As they would do with strange women they might meet for lunch.
Anyone Interested in The Casting Team Contacting Them for House Hunters International (U.S. version) is Invited to Contact @BlondeinAround via Twitter
the redemptive love
Type System Version=SQL Server 2005;
She hesitated.
The first few are just taken around Laura’s garage, from my series that I should have entitled, “Your house has cool stuff in it if only you’d look closer.” Nothing says near-term history like an old rotary-dial telephone.
Then Ehud went out into the vestibule and shut the doors of the roof chamber behind him, and locked them.
Sucker!
I hope I keep this up and it becomes just part of my life rather than being just another 'project' so will just have to see how I go as the year progresses! And it's been really cool seeing the girls copying me and doing their 'excises' as Stella says :)
Later, Artemis, Greek goddess of the moon and of young maidens, was said to wear a crown of mistletoe during the Roman Saturnalia, and indeed, in temples dedicated to Artemis, the priestesses would give her a crown of the parasitic plant during this holiday. Incidentally, the Saturnalia took place from December seventeenth to December twenty-third.
(the whole world was like a sick-house, and there was no rhyme or reason in it)”
I'm also joining the DIY Project Party. Being inspired by others is just the first step. Now get on out there and try a project yourself!!
more and more each day
So, for instance, I have begun a weekly meal plan. I have tried this many times before in the past, but this yr. I'm hoping I can stick to it each wk. Only going to the grocery store once a wk., knowing what meals will be fixed for that wk. and buying only those items that I need for those meals. No more running to the store every time I don't have an ingredient or whatever.
Dogs also may bark at the UPS truck, the mail man, and door to door solicitors. I actually encourage them to bark at solicitors, and let them know if they’d like to take a shot at a crotch attack, I’d totally understand. In fact, I actually require them to do this if the person is hawking religious beliefs.
Maybe a difficult project at work can lead to additional responsibility or knowledge you may not have found before. Plans that fall through with friends just mean you have to keep trying harder to show your friends and loved ones that you won’t bail on them after one failed hangout attempt.
Hi There! I am happy to share with you that there were 30 awesome entries for the CR84FN2 challenge! Thanks to all who played along and to all of you who left sweet comments :) The randomly selected participant for the CR84FN4 Guest Designer is:
Vintage mirrors everywhere, desilvered with time,
Today, Ryan Seacrest asked his female listeners if they were up for having an ‘outing’ with Christian, I believe the main male character in the novel. It seems like Christian is a sexually explicit character who seduces his women? I thought to myself…what if I met a gay Christian? Quite frankly, since I haven’t even read the book, I don’t even know what to expect from this Christian character.
Those are the messages it carries for me, anyway. Of course there is no reason to assume that that's what it succeeds in communicating to anyone else.
She thought for a moment.
Well let me say that silver bells and cockle shells sound nice but like every other nursery rhyme...the truth is far from it. Did you know that Mary was actually "Bloody Mary" or "Queen Mary, daughter of Henry the 8th" if you wanted to keep a spot to place your hat. Apparently, Mary was quite a Catholic believer and didn't approve at all of the Protestant faith so she lopped off heads. The garden from the nursery rhyme refers to the graveyards that ...grew. And! If envisioning tombstones wasn't enough silver bells refered to the thumbscrews and the cockle shells referered to torture instruments that were attached to the genitals. Seriously....it's up to you to decide if it's a compliment for someone to say you've warmed their cockles...and I know one husband that had better never say it.
You'll need nursing bras too, but next time I would buy almost all nursing camis and tanks and very few actual nursing bras. Worn under regular shirts, the nursing camis offer full stomach/back coverage (not to mention extra smoothing action, which is awesome for that post-birth jiggle belly). And also, you know how when you're 9 months pregnant you get insanely hot sometimes? Or maybe you were lucky and you don't know. Or maybe you're a dude who is reading this blog for some bizarre fetish reason and you can imagine (and like to do so while wearing a latex diaper), but you don't know because you don't have a uterus. But that same hot flash happens when you're nursing (and maybe it's just a post-baby thing that formula-feeding moms get too?). Camis and tanks are great because you can just whip off your shirt and still be presentable. Presentable-ish. As presentable as you can be with breastmilk spots and lanolin stains and baby spit up all over your cloths. Oh, for night? The tanks work then too, but I really love the v-neck wrap styles where you can just pull over the cup. Does that even make sense? These:
I don't live in an interesting, pretty neighborhood like Jerusalem's. I live in the town section (and I use that word with a wink) of a tiny rural community. Our street has 16 ranch houses, the late 90s version. Our house is a little on the small side, but is just right for three. The outside is plain and simple, but I think the inside is charming. It makes me happy, anyway. The backyard is spacious with a pasture behind. Aside from my home and family, the beauty in my daily life is on my commute to and from work. I use that word with my tongue in my cheek. I know that most people would laugh at the thought of my 15 minute drive even being called a commute. Still... I love my time in the car each day. On the way to school Sloane and I talk about our hopes and plans for the day. We sing along to Veggie Tales and start our day with prayer time. On the way home we talk about school; what we each learned, interactions with friends, playground stories. I get to hear so much of my child's daily life by being with her immediately after school when everything if fresh. Our drive brings me much beauty and joy each day.
And my husband is an Asst. Fire Chief...and in 2012 has the opportunity to become Fire Chief!
Oh, what if our dreams were just an alternate reality? A reality that takes place in another realm but only when we are sleeping. Time is not the same there and neither are the laws of physics. People can fly, pigs can talk, fire can put itself out or start spontaneously. You can move through time and space just by thinking about it and often randomly end up in a different place without thinking about it, things just ‘happen’. It is an unpredictable world where anything can happen and if we learn to control it with our mind we can alter the outcome. But what if we die in the dream, are we really dead… do we stop dreaming or do we get another life; like in video games. I’m going for the multiple lives since we can’t just stop dreaming. And if we get married in a dream, are we really married… are we committing bigamy for being married to someone else in our waking life…
If you are a blogger, look to the labels in your blog.
After a few years of listening to this CD non stop, I lost it. I was heartbroken. I feared I would never see this comp again. And it took almost another 3 years of searching high and low before a copy popped up on eBay. I put in a $50 bid right away. I was not going to let this go! I ended up getting it for around $4 or something. And since I bought this (probably in 2002 or 2003) I have yet to see another copy for sale.
So, with my handy dandy note paper near by, I jotted down a few post titles in an attempt to get it all organized. I think it's going to work. Here is what you'll have to look forward to over the coming days.
The NYU College of Dentistry is located at 345 East 24th Street (on the corner of 1st Avenue) in Manhattan. Please call (212) 998-9800 with any questions or concerns.
Part 2 comprises generous extracts from Adie’s own writings, and teachings from the Gurdjieff groups which he conducted. The book includes an introduction by Andrew Rawlinson.
Wrong. The lady in the dress is a man in drag I observe as I walk past her to where I was before. The bone structure, the make up, Adam’s apple and all. A man in drag, unmistakable. I see them in a whole new light; this mousy looking little librarian of a lady had fully accepted a man into her life as he is when outside appearances would suggest a whole other story. They kiss and hold one another in public unafraid of what anyone else would think or say, and it is beautiful. There are all kinds of people in this world, most of them are just happy to be in love with someone. Some of them are fortunate enough to be in love with someone real.
This series looked at the hidden Japanese legends and folktales which inspired the narrative backbone of this stunning Wii title, giving a deeper insight into the origin stories behind main characters like Amaterasu and Issun right through to the supporting cast like Urahsima the fisherman and the Oina tribe of Kamui. If you have an interest in Japanese literature, these are for you!
1 fennel bulb with fronds
Do you think he went from that speech to setting up programs? Were they teaching how to lead a great small group?
29 And in the eleventh year of Joram the son of Ahab began Ahaziah to reign over Judah.
In recent years, the UM has been allowed to go on a spree of spinning falsehood, spouting lies, spewing seditious articles and spreading Umno’s unprecedented racist and religious propaganda with impunity – and immunity granted by the Umno Home Minister. It is very obvious where the reporters of Al-Islam got their audacity from in committing their sacrilegious act!
Then the woman removes her veil and wig and shows her real look.
I am curious by nature; about the world, about people. When I started reading blogs, I always ask myself: who are these people? Why do they write what they write? And, what are the things they don't write?
Oh kiss me now
The mix of tweets should be something like this:
Article 32: If another administrative department has already fined the same one unlawful act of the party, the copyright administrative management entity may not fine it again, but may still mete out other sorts of punishment according to the provisions of Article 4 of these Rules, according to the specific circumstances.
Some scientists are even suggesting the possibility of producing an “elixir of youth” for women, where the menopause is eradicated and older women will retain the health they enjoyed when younger.
I knew Helen had a replacement motor (and pedal) so borrowed it to see if it fitted, but I also borrowed a broken (but similar) Singer machine to cannibalise.
I love drunks, I always have.
Sight Reading Contest: 3:40
Do yourself a favor. If you haven't read HALF-BLOOD, stop reading this review and go read my write-up on the first Covenant novel instead. Because if you're like me, you hate being spoiled, and if you haven't read HALF-BLOOD...you'll be spoiled if you continue onward!
I threw together this little arrangement using a pot from something else that I changed up a bit and flowers left over from some of the wreaths that I made.......
Yes, I would love to see pictures of how you used them. Really do. It will make my day.
Oh, fine. It's great that I won, anyway.
easy peasy lemon squeezy
Slain Professor’s Widow Dies
Then I hear this sound (I don’t have my hearing aids in) that sounds like the dog is scratching at the door to get in. So I walk downstairs to let the dog inside. Only she’s already inside. She’s hiding under the table (because she doesn’t like it when I yell.) I look out the little windows in the front door and see Rude Neighbor making her way to the drivers’ side door of her car. And I think, that’s weird. She left ages ago. Why is she still here? Momentary worry that she heard me yelling, but then I think, “She’s outside. She just heard generalized yelling, probably not specifics of what I was saying.”
Not blogging very often, but still sewing up my stash ;-0 The pleasure of scrap quilts has taken over my life (when I'm not out working in my new yard, that is...) I'm discovering a creative outlet I never dreamed existed in my previous world of more predictable pre-planned quilts!
gives me new life
Mix the dry ingredients in a mixing bowl. Add the tofu, water, soy sauce and olive oil to a food processor and blend until combined. Add the dry mixture to the food processor. Mix it until a ball forms.
Leaving me fervent and ecstatic
I’ve discovered that the one exception to this rule is carrots. You know, the little baby ones that you can eat by the bag full. Or, that I can eat by the bag full while writing without realizing that I’ve just eaten an entire bag of carrots. Don’t judge me!
Everything about them. Sitting on the edge of the sidewalk till your butt is numb, or being smart enough to drag a lawn chair out there with you, because standing up for an hour seems so overrated. Even though loads of people are walking for miles for your entertainment.
Clearly, the reference in the Circular to both private and public lands merely recognizes that the island can be classified by the Executive department pursuant to its powers under CA No. 141. In fact, Section 5 of the Circular recognizes the then Bureau of Forest Development’s authority to declare areas in the island as alienable and disposable when it provides:
15 years ago, not too many people ventured into these areas unless they lived there or made money on the streets. Notorious, the bio-pic film about Christopher Wallace, gave a glimpse of the drug trafficking going on in the neighborhood. But this didn't reflect on the entire population of the place. For the majority of the residents, it was a love-hate relationship with there home surroundings.
I rushed out of the meeting to attend a Dashing Whippets track workout. I ran it with E -- we took turns leading laps. I felt strong and my knee was feeling great. D, the runner who I helped when he had his backpack stolen last week, gave me a generous gift as a thank you. Two tickets to see Rock of Ages at the Helen Hayes Theater. I'm looking forward to going.
I added tiny hearts to every second cross path and some birds to the sentiment area to finish, loving Nordic Spring in a BIG WAY!!
Style: Organic Modern
If you are looking for a special set of china for this coming Christmas – The new collection from Marcel Wanders is exciting, innovative, affordable and fun.
un-necessary surgery does not help.
would be able to buy US$425,000. This is what we call “Gononomics”.
1/4 teaspoon of ground cloves
This year I am going to enter more challenges, want to have a little fun here.
Amy Lignor began her career at Grey House Publishing in northwest Connecticut where she was the Editor-in-Chief of numerous educational and business directories.
Jack loves him too! According to Jack, "Owl's name is Bird." The lovely lady who sold Bird to me said he's the first of his design, so he's extra special. And I love that he's going to travel all over the world with us.
Eventually we found our coconut trees and we parked the cars in the shade, unloaded the boat, set up some chairs and off we went to explore.
What next for The Millipede Engine?
She wrapped her arms around her knees and cried harder. It was just yesterday when she had started her life all over again. Why did this have to happen? What did God want from her? What would she do now? And what about Arham?
The Eastern traditional approach is for people who want immersion into an ancient and proven methodical teaching with a single teacher to whom one is committed as a student for a long time, if not a lifetime.
Fiskars 3 in 1 corner punch "LACE"- 8.00 NEVER USED but out of box
The finish is clean, fruity and just off crisp – 89/100 points.
Some of the departments are more favored and might even have a better market “value” and people from those departments (districts) are more privileged and have nicer offices, labs, and equipment. Some of the departments struggle for every little thing that they get and others are swimming in what looks like opulence. The favored districts also find that their students might have more opportunity and job prospects once they graduate. These students are thought of as lucky–they are most likely to have a better idea about what they will do after they graduate.
Just because you have a lot of money, right now, doesn’t mean you’re smarter/better/kinder/wiser than anyone else on this planet. It just means you have more money. Get over yourself.
They have to wait endlessly for the meals, medication and such basic needs. A complaint creates disharmony and that is one reason many old people prefer to stay quite.
If we may be of assistance in this matter, please do not hesitate to write.
It might also be because my mind is board? Dave gets frustrated with me sometimes because I always have to be planning things and changing things. I always have him helping me set stuff up or asking his opinions on stuff. I blame it on my mom. :)
lights no song.
With unemployment still over 8%, we have more ingenuity, energy, spirit, and expertise than we have jobs–and definitely more time on our hands. We’ve seen individuals using that time to tap into the all-American barn-raising spirit to “widen the circle of our concern,” as President Obama said in his speech responding to the shooting of then-Congresswoman Gabrielle Giffords.
We weren't, of course. We were, all of us, on stand-by 24 hours a day, if Brian needed us. What he wasn't ready to say could wait, and that remains true today. Maybe we're not done. Maybe we are. No matter what, we are all unconditionally available to Brian, and to his comrades, and to one another.
There is definitely a great benefit to working one-on-one. Unfortunately, the realities of the profession make such opportunities hard to come by. There simple isn’t enough money in the budgets of the various school and government organisations to provide tutors for everyone. We are blessed in our community to have volunteer tutors from the university, paid tutors from America Reads, and parents who give of their time to work with students after school. While there are still not enough resources to provide the support that everyone needs, I have seen that what is available is being used to the highest degree. It reminds me of the proverbial story of the boy tossing starfish along the beach back into the ocean. Critique the story as you will, the moral is still true: it may not make a difference for everyone, but it does make a difference for the one.
The local men never last.
The Supperclub Challenge was one of the seven dishes - an appetizer called Puttanesca Panzarottis. Basically, they are mini-calzones. The original recipe includes anchovies but since sea animals should get to celebrate life and the holidays as well, I substituted spinach. And of course, the cheeses used are vegan and cow-friendly. I also omitted sugar from the tomato sauce because I just never use sugar in tomato sauce.
You are a contemptible lot, over yonder. Some of you are Commissioners, and some Lieutenant-Governors, and some have the V. C., and a few are privileged to walk about the Mall arm in arm with the Viceroy; but I have seen Mark Twain this golden morning, have shaken his hand, and smoked a cigar—no, two cigars—with him, and talked with him for more than two hours! Understand clearly that I do not despise you; indeed, I don’t. I am only very sorry for you, from the Viceroy downward. To soothe your envy and to prove that I still regard you as my equals, I will tell you all about it.
But should I do it in the 20’s again? I’ve had a couple of long running CoC campaigns, and they have both taken place between 1919 and 1922. One I set in the Los Angeles area, and the other shorter campaign in and around Arkham.
Living in the NW I don't get a white Christmas very often (though they are predicting snow for next week--and I am not sure if I want to cross my fingers for snow, or for no snow. I do have to do some Thanksgiving traveling), so I decided this year I am going to make my Christmas decor a little more "white". For years my Christmas decorating has focused on red, white, silver and glass with a loose snowflake theme. And while I still love all that stuff and will likely use a lot of it in my living room, I am going to go a little more soft and natural in my family room, where all my decor is soft and natural. Here is a peek at last year's decor. . .
Um...okay.
Still all so unbelievable.
For the upcoming album, the title is supposed to be ‘City Complex’. Still no details regarding the title track and the rest of the tracks up to now but the first track announced in the club page seems to be ‘ 눈물바다’. From the performance that day, I felt that they brought some rock sound inside their music so we might expect quite a variety of sound in their new album with pop, rock and electronic sound blend together. Hope that they will keep their fun tune because their songs are very easy to digest for first listeners.
If you jump into Mac Mail, and into Preferences, the GPGMail tab will allow you to specify a default personal key to sign with. You may need to click the reload button to the right to see the key you just generated.
There’s an association between flares and coronal mass ejections, but it’s a relationship we don’t quite understand scientifically. Sometimes the CME launches before the flare occurs, and vice versa.
Anyway, before I reveal too many spoilers, here ya go! Enjoy episode 6!
On January 15th, 2010 Todd Grantham was announced as the University of Georgia Bulldogs’ new Defensive Coordinator. The following statement was given at a press conference introducing Coach Grantham to the Bulldog Nation:
Given this background, it would be trite to label all variations as copies. However, that is not the case. The listener can tell the difference between a plain-vanilla copy, and a copy with additional bells and whistles. Therefore, in my opinion, a sliding scale test may be adopted to adjudge the extent of copy: One end has the simple copy to copy, and the other end has the copy that sounds totally different than the original. Therefore a vast majority of the creations may fall in a gray zone-neither a complete copy nor a full creative variation on an original.
Meanwhile a Purdue University storm researcher reported that “a receipt from a tire store in Joplin, Mo., turned up 525 miles away on a front porch in north-central Indiana, a record distance for apparent tornado debris to travel,” according to a report.
Coca-Cola claimed that it was the first company to register the trade mark at the Brazilian National Institute of Industrial Property (INPI) back in 2004. It further argued that the mark is not merely descriptive, since it has no meaning. Among the arguments, it claimed Ordinance 27/1998 of the Ministry of Health which handles sign that are not registrable as trade mark – in this case it does not allow the use of the word zero in conjunction with other words, such as sugar. This is so, because the intention of the words is to inform consumers about the composition of the products. Furthermore, the company claimed that the use of the mark ‘zero’ by AMBEV is taking advantage and used unfairly (i.e. unfair competition law) and noted that the use will confuse consumers. However this latter argument was dismissed by the rapporteur of the case, Francisco Loureiro, explaining that the word zero does not produce confusion among the consumers since the package of Coca-Cola and AMBEV are quite different – adding that both products are well consolidated and differentiated in the market. In other words, it is saying that the most distinctive a mark is, the less it would lead to cause confusion.
There was another piece a while back, before I started the blog, describing how banks in Indiana are actually walking away from foreclosures because it would cost them more to maintain the house than they would net from a foreclosure.
Okay, next Monday I will be in the US, touring around the wide open spaces, visiting schools and bookstores from California to Chicago and beyond! I will be the Robin to Rachel Hawkins' Batman, but that's because I've always thought I looked good in green shorts.
My new project is a "patchwork"ed blanket from granny squares.
Title- The Bleeding House (2011)
Techniques of detecting lies provide a clue as to how one may learn how to effectively lie. While many liars are detected by the content of what they’re saying, for example through contradicting themselves, one may feel like someone is lying based on something else. Usually that something else is their body language – the unconscious actions we do when we lie to someone else. By learning the body language and respective gestures which give away a liar, one may avoid these body language cues when attempting to lie. This would align the liar’s verbal message and non-verbal message; thereby effectively reinforcing their message overall – true or not.
One reason we spend a lot of effort on this blog is not to talk the country down but rather to shake people from their self-induced slumber as regards the realities of South Africa. I'm sure most of you have spent a lot of time arguing with friends and family about the direction of the country, that things are just not right and that unless we change the country, it is doomed to fail.
“The group worked with seriousness, determination and thoroughness that was demanded of them. They did a tremendous job,” Musa said.
But (and here it gets uncomfortably personal) -- after consumption, I never feel quite so good. Don't get me wrong, the preparing, mixing, and eating parts are great! Lots of finger-licking deliciousness. It's just afterwards, my skin feels a little itchy and I get a bit queasy and... (ahem) gasy. So yes, I get sick -- could I be allergic? I can't imagine giving up my one true culinary talent and favorite food! So there, I said it. Out in the open. Just like any other relationship, my guacamole and I have its ups and downs. But, no big deal -- it's love!
I’ve got my copy of the Oxford Companion to Beer and shall be busy with it for some time. I’m 2000 words into my review and I’m only in the Cs. A long, nit-picking review will be along shortly, but I’ve just seen something that is so gobsmackingly appalling that I have to post it right now.
As I delved more deeply, learned to find a place of confidence and certainty within myself that allowed me, at long last, to sever the ties that bound me to my abusive parents and an abusive sibling, as well; I found a more natural and open place within myself.
Brenda from The Tie That Binds Us: Although she has been on a break, Brenda is a blogger with substance. Besides being a fellow homeschooler of high school age students, Brenda and I have many of the same ideas about homeschooling. She shares so much with the homeschooling community and I hope you get to know her better.
Dinner with Jay and his fiance Jasmine, who is warm and lovely, at a sushi place. Yummy, crunchy, fiery, with green tea mochi to top it off. Wonderful. Except I felt the imminent signs of illness coming on: fever, body aches, a scratchy throat.
So, ask if you must, but be prepared to be redirected. Thanks so much for coming here to visit with me and to share, it has been a blast. I hope you stick around. I love having you here!
27 these
Hey guess what? The word "Casket" was actually the name of the box that you would put jewelry in. Casket was an euphemism instead of using the word coffin. I just don't understand how the word "coffin" is so offensive or scary.
Does that make it worth it? Is one story worth buying a book that is filled with a great deal of mediocre fiction with a couple of gems floating within?
Mouth feel: A fine body to this one.
Sources for Global IntAKE included (and still include) our network of contacts in the media – particularly freelance journalists. AKE has worked closely with the press since the company was founded in 1991. As well as providing training and low-key close protection to the media around the world AKE also maintains a growing network of journalists who participate in an information-sharing network. This gives us access to insight from the frontline of many a conflict zone or emerging news story.
Vocabulary: Vocabulary From Classical Roots A & B
Do you have any success stories to share?
an exposed lack of faith
We found ours at Jo-Ann's, on the bolt, buy by the yard, in their interfacing section.
As we made our way to our seats, we were greeted on the left by a massive white Ganesh, the bringer of beginnings and the remover of obstacles. Our seats were nice and cozy and were set right next to the kitchen, seen through funky lit strings (seen in the picture above). I think this really shows what Thali is about: classic, gourmet Indian food with a modern twist.
The first is for Scrap the girls where you need to do a layout with the work 'love' in the title and some distressing. My title is I will love you forever and I distress around the photo (like I always do) and around paper and some embellishments
I have a Christmas card that I will keep forever. It means a lot to me. It is from my son.
The legendary blues singer indeed lives up to the silly clichй about being able to sing the phone book and make it sound rich, meaningful, and soulful. Still, it's always exciting to hear her tackle materials she's missed before. Here she shifts gears impressively into the intimate jazz club mode, performing beautifully arranged takes on a wide variety of standards (from "Come Rain or Come Shine" to "Cry Me a River") under the direction of producer John Snyder and arranger/pianist Cedar Walton. Those two gathered a handful of great jazz players and recorded the initial tracks without James, who had a touch of the flu. A few months later she had recovered and did the amazing vocal sessions which truly sound live and in synch with the music. Beginning with the redemptive theme of "This Bitter Earth," each song allows her to explore both tenderness and guttural emotions, even a little irony on clever twists like "He's Funny That Way." There are also perfectly placed spotlights for the featured musicians. "This Bitter Earth" and "He's Funny That Way" feature a thoughtful improvisation by Walton, while Duke Ellington's "In My Solitude" has a passionate interlude by tenor saxophonist Red Holloway. Most of the vocals are textured over a bed of simmering brass, adding to the old school big band flavor that creates the atmosphere for the project. It's certainly common for great artists to thank their parents for various influences, but James goes one step further on the title track, allowing her mom to sing the tune; mom is no match for her daughter, but it's still a unique touch that adds emotional dimension to an already emotionally rich affair. ~ Jonathan Widran
Standing by the side of the runway and playing his music as his models strutted on the runway; most of them attempting what they cannot do — jiving down the catwalk. It was meant to appear as a fun show, but unfortunately it didn’t.
"It needs to be signed, yes."
How would you like to describe your music?
To honor Crom, and their inability to be tamed, I present to you:
And finally, Osborne King will be holding a distressed property auction of 27 lots at the Holiday Inn on Ormeau Road in Belfast on 29th September, 2011. By “distressed” I mean the properties in the auction all appear to be offered on the instruction of receivers, administrators and mortgage companies in possession.
I expressed by displeasure to the poor girl in no uncertain terms, telling her exactly how frustrated and upset I was by this pure lack of professionalism on their behalf. How you can run a business supplying mythical goods is beyond me. I was distinctly peeved when she informed me that although my order had now been cancelled the money would not be returned to my account for five business days. Ah, so that is how they make their money, earning interest on mine!
As it happened Sunday again dawned clear and bright, but there was definitely more wind around. We were making plans over breakfast for a good stomp up some hills when Gary Stenhouse phoned from the Ski Centre saying there was hardly any wind at all! This was surprising but very welcome news so once we’d packed up and settled up we headed up the road again and before too long found ourselves heading up to takeoff on the chairlift hoping that the wind wasn’t playing tricks on us.
So, then, how do we ‘live a life worthy of the Lord and may please him in every way: bearing fruit in every good work, growing in the knowledge of God’? Can we? Should we bother trying? We are weak people, weakened daily by the pressures of daily friction involving our friends, co-workers, family members and any and all in between; strangers and enemies too. The fact that Paul says we are ‘being strengthened’ (he says something closer, and rougher, akin to ‘by all power being continually empowered’) means that we are necessarily weak, prone to weakness, constantly being drained of whatever we may call power or strength.
5. It won’t happen overnight!!! I don’t care what anyone tries to tell you. It can happen in weeks or months depending on how hard you work and how quickly you master the skills, but it will take time.
All while being a shady character. Who wears lipstick and high heels.
"The next war would take a very heavy toll," one protester said. "Thousands of rockets will explode every day, and there are no gas masks."
There’s the “School Presentation Applause,” the kind where people are just clapping because it’s the polite thing to do and only about half of them really were paying attention. That kind of applause follows you around, I think. From school into work during board meetings and while it’s “nice,” it’s not.
Regrettably, those times flew by way too quickly and today, it is sadly not the same. I can’t remember the last time I was with ALL of my cousins in one place at the same time. I have to confess, it is not a small feat to get them all together. There are 22 cousins in all and count in all our spouses or significant others and their children, the number goes up WAY higher. I am not sure we will ever be in the same place at once.
Readers will enjoy the action as Jaden and her friends run from their lives from the deadly storms, and work hard to figure out ways they can apply science to solving life-threatening problems. I particularly liked the way that Messner creates a dystopian novel that will draw in children ages 9 - 12; these children are the young side for the brutal violence of The Hunger Games, but they are fascinated by the dark possibilities that our actions today might bring.
Hang three suns in the vault;
minor things could be better!”
The UPS man just left a package yesterday from ShopRuger.com with a couple of additional stainless, eight-round magazines and a set of black Ruger grips by Hogue with the Ruger insignia on each grip. They're not that much thinner than the beautiful wood grips that came with the SR1911, but I like the feel better and the wood grips look so good, I hate to scratch'em up.
–one personal quest line. with cutscenes similar to SWTOR. This is the only “rails” in the game.
Still, like so many other crimes where race might be a factor, this one is not so clear-cut. Mr. Neesmith says he felt threatened. He says he aches for the parents but believes none of this would have happened if the young men had not been in his house when they should not have been.
Heroic Media's strategy:
Finally, my version of the Mitred Crosses throw, knitted in 4-ply Shetland and scraps of sock-yarn. I've decided it need not be any larger. I am pondering how to edge it, and leaning towards a flat cable to suggest a band of quilting. We will see.
White Cake:
of snow
And lived at Rome under the good Augustus,
An adult who’s lost several family members over a lifetime will look at death differently than a teen living through it for the very first time. That’s a huge plus. I also get to experiment with form writing at this level where I don’t get to as much or period when writing for adults. It’s like it’s only in its infancy with teen readers to read in different forms, while adult readers have been through the deconstructionists, the minimalists, the anti-storyists, the metafictionists. We’re doing really exciting stuff, I feel.
#14. dark chocolate
Heat the oil, saute the garlic until fragrant. Add in onions, cook until translucent.
It was enough to procure them a casket for an entire week! All the punks came dressed nicely and the girls wore black. Jerry got inside the casket before they wheeled it out. Then Chris Lord of Plastic Idols read his eulogy. The event went over very well. The band played a show in the store and then left the casket in there for a week with records for sale inside of it.
Ladybugs/Lady beetles are frequent house guests. Their numbers are down from three years ago. Instead of hundreds, we see maybe a few dozen congregate beetles twice a year.
Jean Zoss: I'm not much of an art book person. I was lucky to receive such good, basic instruction in art elements and design from the books used in high school and college. I do, however, view many of the mixed media technique videos on You Tube. I'm a big believer in making it your own and I am able to do this because of all the years of classes in the basics. I am a fan of many different photography and art magazines, however. But if it means spending money on magazines or art supplies, supplies always win.
My bookshelf is full of craft books. I love all of them but am especially fond of the books by those I know. This week, I'm happy to brag about Heather Power's new book, "Jewelry Designs from Nature: Woodlands, Gardens, Sea."
I propose that Fulford spend six months recovery time on a peaceful planet like Erra; only a few days will have passed now-time when he is returned, but he will be returned a new man (and not a clone!)…P’Taah and Semjase will deliver this offer to him later today.
The kids enjoyed this book as well and started telling me the
1. Spotlighted an Artist: I introduced the kids to Chuck Close. I asked them to make the same faces as the people in the portraits. Of course Owen wanted nothing to do with my art lesson.
In 2009 Canadians consumed 3.79 kg of cheddar cheese per capita. Cheddar Cheese is nearly a third (it is actually 31%) of the total cheese consumed by Canadians each year. That means that, on average, every man, woman and child eats 8.4 pounds of Cheddar Cheese a year.
Contractions started timeably but not painfully on the Saturday before Thanksgiving. I walked for miles and miles (Ryan was so great, driving the dogs and me to the park over and over again!) trying to keep labor going! Contractions would intensify on the walks but become more mild when I rested. Sunday was the same but the contractions were becoming more uncomfortable when I was exercising. "This is it!" I thought as I danced every single dance on the "Just Dance" Wii game! Yeah, picture my 9 month pregnant ass playing "Just Dance" in our basement! Still, contractions were not intense enough and I didn't feel like Emma had dropped hardly at all! I couldn't sleep, I was so excited!
Into the Cannibal’s Pot is topped and tailed with hard evidence that allows conclusions vis-à-vis the aggregate characteristics of South African society. Although not necessarily politically correct, such conclusions are perfectly proper. With this in mind, a word about the titular tease. Cannibalism, attests Leonard Thompson, author of The Oxford History of South Africa, was widespread during the upheaval associated with rise of the Zulu Kingdom in the 1820s.13 These days, in northeastern Congo, two prominent militias, the Lendu and the Hema, delight in demonstrating to UN observers their culinary creativity with human hearts and livers.
java.lang.OutOfMemoryError: PermGen space
Then when I was 16 my mother passed away. Shortly after, my Dad asked that I resurrect that talk and give it again with a renewed, mature perspective. So I did.
My friend; the third stonecutter will suffer the most, of course. Dreams, cathedrals and grandeur will have no place in my world of hope and change. We don’t need a cathedral for broken secular dreams. There is no need of big block walls for a fortress. Who would believe that we would fight to to defend a dream for which we go abroad and apologize so willingly? We certainly to not need stout stones to build strong banks when they have done their best to disburse their monies into home mortgages and other loans to people without the means to pay on them.
Bake for 20-25 minutes or until breadcrumbs are golden brown.
BLOODY SECRETS HORROR STORIES by Claire Joseph
**Update form my last post. I do not officially have the job yet. I still have to interview with HR/the Board. I was hoping to have this done tomorrow, but I am still waiting on the call. I cannot enter that classroom (or begin curriculum training) until that is processed! Pray this goes quickly! I plan on moving in with my parents sunday night- The hubby will follow later. **
Has it really come to this? The devil’s pact of Islamism and Communism are now the dictatorial rulers of Europe? Hitler, Lenin, Stalin and Mussolini were guilty of not only destroying the lives of their enemies; they ultimately destroyed those they purported to represent. Europeans are now faced with the astonishing and terrifying prospect of being dictatorially controlled as an enemy of the state, not its friend, and when we see what totalitarian regimes do their friends, let alone their enemies, we should be extremely, if not obsessively, concerned.
Dressed in rags, not eating, binding his words, unbinding his hair, he began to see his spiritual form. Like an uncultured insane demon, he waited for and relied on no one and nothing. He listened to no one, as if he was deaf.
Jennifer with her Birthday gift I made for her using My Digital Studio from Stampin' Up!
The Guitar Center logo is a registered trademark of Guitar Center, Inc. Other brand or product names may be trademarks of the respective companies with which they are associated.
A Drink with Shane MacGowan – by Shane MacGowan & Victoria Mary Clarke
Here is some inspiration from our DT :
But at my lowest (and even before), God granted me a huge outpouring of his grace. I got help from unexpected places, people I barely knew, stopping by to hold my crying baby, so I could eat something or take a shower. People brought food. Some e-mailed me words of wisdom that made a huge impact in that moment. Lots prayed.
Firstly, create a new app, remove the tomcat plugin and install the jetty plugin.
So, now, I’m drinking my 4th of 4 beverages for the day. I took time to heat it up rather than stand at the sink and gulp it down, although I am eating (drinking) while blogging, so I’m not entirely focused. Still, by typing, I have to take time between sips, and focus on how it feels to slowly grow full from a hot beverage.
Oh gosh... I don't know if I really dare let tell you about this.... You see, you might become as addicted as I and forget to eat, brush your teeth, wash, sleep...
This postcard pictures the members of the Knights of Columbus work party with the Walleye and Northern Pike caught on their annual outing to Lake of the Woods. The people in the photo were from Hastings, Minnesota. The location is American Point Resort, Penasse, Minnesota.
168 **7. “Human Nature and the First Amendment.” University of Pittsburgh Law Review, vol. 40, pp. 661-778 (Summer 1979). (Sources: Items D-V/25/1977, D-VII/4/1976, D-III/21/1974, D-V/6/1976, D-I/19/1973, D-III/9/1976, and D-VI/22/1978, below.)
There is a predominant teaching in Christendom today that proclaims God has two separate ‘peoples’, National Israel and the Church.
So without further ado, and with a LOT of playlist mucking-about, here's my Top Five selections from Propeller.
Thank you for your prayers and good wishes. Continue to pray for us as we seek the Lord 's will and guidance for the furtherance of His kingdom.
4. 5 Dolls for an August Moon
Still, the record makes for a good listen. The example posted is an extended track from the B side.
We just came back from an amazing event in Carmel Valley and I'm here today to show you some behind the scenes pictures from our sweet journey. Out of respect for the client, I am not showing event decor details of the wedding or the dessert table, but I know you all love the behind the scenes shots. Being on this trip was somewhat like a reality show. I was there with Lisa, Eric and Naomi, three members of my team. With all of our quirky personalities, there were many laugh-until-our-stomach-hurts moments and in hindsight I wish I had it on video to share with you.
...all things visible and invisible...
Dark Lord begins to squeeze the officer's throat, creating a
very hip!
Margaret Curran, Labour
Jesus begins, wisely, by asking the disciples the less awkward and less personal question: who do others say I am?
Famous Mormon, Marriner Eccles is credited for saving the Federal Reserve system from collapse during the Great Depression. In fact, the Federal Reserve Building is actually named after him.
The ring was created by Beverly Hills jeweler Robert Procop.
tight body
And yet they are not three almighties: but one almighty.
11) Princess Maxima of the Netherlands *Thanks Ida!*
Once again I am in cahoots with Cherlyn Cochrane from Over a Cup Of Coffee. Last year we, along with several other bloggers answered 31 questions during the month of May. The questions required total honesty so the month was called 31 Days of Blogging Honesty.
Hot ashes for trees?
Repetitive advertising on television and radio employs an old and well-researched marketing strategy. In fact, research has concluded that people need to see (and hear) an advert at least seven times before the message begins to sink in. However, in the case with the annoying porno advert on e-TV, urging viewers to sms “PORN” to number xxxxxx, the advertiser has obviously gone totally overboard. Instead of showing the advert once, seven times in a row every 10 minutes, they are showing it 10-plus times in one session, repeating the session every 10 minutes, - enough to drive even the dogs in the household crazy!
No doubt you’re familiar with the story. Elijah had challenged the 400 prophets of Baal to prove who was real: Baal or God. And, of course, God won the contest! Everyone in the nation turned back to God.
"She's drowning," my mother said to my dad.
Not too surprising, but David Elkington has popped up again on Facebook to briefly attempt to stoke the fires of interest in his codices. He posted a series of articles about political unrest in Jordan. Someone asked how the situation would affect the codices and he responded with this:
by John Shors
10 Mountain
My ankle was sore today. It was sore yesterday as well but I reckoned it would figure out that an injury was unwelcome if I ignored it long enough. That didn’t work, apparently. Like the house guest that won’t take the hint and keeps sticking around, the soreness persisted. I had to run short again. And slowly. But I got some miles in and marked off day 42 of consecutive days running.
Embossing Folder: Cuttlebug Polka Dots
"I recalled my father saying he sometimes felt his most vital mission at St. Cuthbert's wasn't to comfort the afflicted but to afflict the comfortable. 'We can't all be so fortunate as to minister to lepers and thieves and prostitutes,' he'd say. 'Some of us are called to the much less dramatic task of stirring up the sediment in complacent souls'." (pp. 42-43).This book is perfect for the Women Unbound reading challenge (this link takes you to my musings on being a feminist). Margaret is musing here about the discussion she and her oldest friend had about names:
When he related this sorry situation to me upstairs, as he was getting dressed, I must admit my first thought was that something much more serious had occurred. Perhaps he'd cut himself? Maybe he'd had a dizzy spell? Slipped on the floor? But no! It was just spilled milk (albeit, chocolate soy).
*Took her first dance class (liked it, but didn't love it)
Master Malrubius leaned forward, his eyes burning brighter than the coals of the fire. "Which is highest, Severian?"
I tried out a couple of new trails and looped them all together for a lovely medley but the last 7 miles back to my house were boring and on roads. (I am so spoiled with the beautiful trail systems out here that I hardly ever have to run on a road).
He's only on site for 15 minutes and beginning to interview Breene.
Even if it’s a bit embarrassing
1 tablespoon ground turmeric
Missing links hide in full view until you are ready. they will present themselves as the picture forms.
The seawater sloshes relentlessly
to put me in the place
Over the hours, the labor pains had sharpened... She kept thinking the waves would slow or break for a moment, but they didn't, one after another until there was nowhere left to go but in, to dive down and hope for air on the other side, but there was no air, no way out, just a desperate reaching and grasping until finally she felt something deep inside her—not physical, not emotional, simply her—break into pieces. And into the arms of that cracked-apart person that had been Claire, they placed a baby and a love came out of her, through the pieces, that she didn't even know was possible.
Richard Kruspe - Lead guitar
hearts). He stews these body parts. When the stew is ready, he tells
Again, I do not mean God as a particular linguistic ideal either, like loving or wise or old and white-bearded like Santa Zeus. No, I mean God as the indescribable, the one word that we know is beyond regular words, the ineffable, the mysterious, the great unknown (uncontainable) that is so far beyond our capacity for language that we can conceptually accept only that it is absolutely beyond our understanding, beyond “what we know that we don’t know.” We have no idea what the word God means, and, in the one exceptional case of this particular word, we actually might just even admit it!
some men have killed a white buffalo.
We have an aspiring Bollywood movie director from Germany ! Yes, Germany. You read it right. Germany. Candidate’s name is Julia and she is a nursing student. Her biggest hobby is watching Bollywood movies and creating ‘new movies’. She declares that her biggest obsession is editing. Check out some her ‘works’
He clears his throat. "Try to understand. Bin Laden may be dead, but he was just one of many. There are still those out there that hate our American culture, that hate our American way of life, and will stop at nothing to destroy us."
I spent three days the weekend before last at the Western Australia V8 Supercars event at Barbagallo Raceway, Wanneroo. I worked for Samsung in the Vodafone Holden team marquee demonstrating the sketching abilities of the new Samsung Galaxy Note phone/pad. Using the standard installed 'Memo S' software I drew 'free' caricatures for all who wanted them. It was non stop.
The celebration begins at 10:00 a.m. on April 21.
Twenty-nine countries out of a 31-country* sample scored less than 60 on a 100-point scale on questions assessing the effectiveness of laws regulating individual and corporate donations to political parties, as well as the auditing of those donations and campaign expenditures. Government monitoring agencies tasked with enforcing such laws typically lack investigative power and often have little to no authority to impose sanctions.
This dish was the axis venison / spiced broth / haikurei turnips / sunflower sprouts / daikon. It isn't a traditional pho by any stretch. It was a fantastic take on a pho with exceptionally tender venison.
2Where heav'nly-pensive contemplation dwells,
Hello all my friendly blog followers! I wanted to update everyone with some cool news. If you are a fan of this site (and I hope you are!) I first want to say that I will not be shutting down this site, I love writing it and I’m glad you read it!
So, back to the question what can you do, or rather, what can we do to create peace in the world? Again the quote from Psyclone:
Well,on a lighter note,I have finished Mr.Goodegg taking a break,he’s alittle rough around the edges but still full of cuteness.Do you have a Mr.Goodegg in your life,our family does,he’s my brother in law’Tom’,Amy L.’s husband.He GIVES from the top of his head,down to his toes and never wants the glory of his works,their are not enough words in the dictionary to describe his giving soul.
“Let me sleep on it,” Hood said finally.
I've made a lot of photos across the years. Good ones, bad ones, photos of moments I'd prefer to forget and others again which keep memories fresh and alive. Images dutifully recording who we were, what we were doing and with whom. The past becomes frozen, an instance in time captured on an emulsion for evermore.
UMNO was desperate to get the crowd to hoodwink the rakyat that Malaysians are fully supporting UMNO.
So far I don't see any proposal for a Business Masterclass for patent agents to make them more commercially aware of how IP really develops within a business. Only occasionally do patent agents get full feedback on the impact of IP on the long term business cycle and never if they work in firms who major on the profitable agency work, so access to real business school training might be welcome.
Nori
The hard work of genuine community has been outsourced, she said, to technology — so we become the product of our technology, shaping our image to meet the demands of the market.
Yes. Please include in your submission a short reason why you feel you would like to be on our team.
HAAHHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAAHHAAHHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAAHAHAHAHAHAHA
I believe Auster is a philo-semite. He favors Jews. On his blog he openly speaks in favor of White interests and against the various forms of liberal insanity that threaten Whites, but to my knowledge (and I admit I have not read everything he has ever written) he has not (except see below) discussed Jewish influence over that insanity and their relative exemption from it. Even when obvious opportunities arise he passes them by. As illustrated by the examples cited below, when the subject comes up outside his tightly-controlled blog he quickly and needlessly resorts to innuendo, distortion, and insults. His logic on the subject is exceedingly thin.
CRITICAL MASS: As of 4/26/12: Rotten Tomatoes: 78% positive reviews. Metacritic: 57/100.The reviews are solidly positive.
Turk: "Bro?" Dude, bros don't even use "bro." You're not as hip as you think you are.
Think about all the times you were criticized and didn’t change. Rav Simcha Zissel Ziv of Kelm would say, “Don’t become angry if you can’t make people be the way you wish them to be, because you too can’t make yourself the way you wish to be.” Confront the person himself. It’s very tempting to share our resentment of someone with others. However, the obligation is to rebuke the person himself, not destroy his good name. Give him an opportunity to defend himself. Before criticizing someone, ask yourself the following questions: Am I being fair or am I exaggerating? How can I express myself without inflicting too much pain? How would I feel if someone criticized me this way? Am I enjoying criticizing this person? Is my criticism confined to a specific act or trait? Are my words non-threatening and in part reassuring?
As some of you know I spent almost 7 years, from 2002 to 2009, working as a full-time nanny in New York City. What started as a way to afford to live in the city while completing my bachelor’s degree turned into an invaluable education itself. A few recent articles in the NY Times have got me thinking about the lessons I learned from the children and families I cared for not too long ago. The first article was “Ritilan Gone Wrong” which addressed the concern that ADD drugs don’t work long term in children. Another article in last week’s Sunday Times Magazine was about puberty starting in girls as young as first grade. The latter article seems to completely skip over what seems to me to be one of the most obvious causes (and solutions!) to both issues raised in these two essays: food. The quality and quantity of the food we feed our children has, gasp, a profound effect on their health.
Also, whatever you choose, make a point to celebrate the little good things along the way. I've come to savor the small miracles. They might be the only ones I get! Even if the Big Stuff doesn't happen, there's a lot of beauty and satisfaction to be found in the work of writing.
Despite whoever was tiptoeing their way in, the boiling mess of soup was making its way onto the
Part market, part deli counter but mostly restaurant, Mercado Buenos Aires is the place to go for a lovingly crafted meat-intensive meal with exquisite desserts. Taking up the bulk of a small Van Nuys strip mall on Sepulveda, the Mercado's lack of ambiance or even passable service in some cases is made up for by the food. There are empanadas, milanesa, Spanish style egg tortillas and many other choices, but the things to get here are the parrillada.
What do you guys think? And can anyone tell me how to get the larger image up on Goodreads when the thumbnail version is already there?
Be extremely careful while caramelising the onions, as one bad move (could scorch) and your soup could taste bitter.
Or it chooses me
Hello Lovelies,
Alot of people have asked, to here my beloved coming out story, the period of time that changed my life. Well, only here would you find such a thing. Coming out for me, before i begin, was a hard and long process because i felt alienated by the public, and the hatred people had always said about homosexual’s.
At one point there was a boy, a year or two older than Tyrannosaurus Tevye who had a skateboard. This was deemed very exciting by Mr. Tevye. The boy offered to let Tevye have a go, but since he didn’t have a helmet, or any pads, the offer was declined.
Aha more Pakatan red tapists! This article seems innocuous enough but it’s intent is CONTROL of the voters again. Look here ‘councilmen’ the GUIDELINES do not exist if the Rakyat say so. The Rakyat does not have to be aware of anything the BN guys wrote in some airconditioned office 20 years ago that Pakatan now throws at the voters that the Rakyat will never wanted to go along even in 1993 with nor wants to pay their tax funds for. Who the hell are the people who wrote the so-called NUISANCE rules? BN. Why the hell is Pakatan throwing these BN written rules at us without amendments?
And to combat my anxiety, I put in place some rules around riding up the mountain, chiefly no talking and no moving and holding on tight.
11. Go on Myspace, email, instant messenger, or other forms of communication, including, shocking though it may be, the actual physical presence of another sentient being.
Policymakers 20 years ago, extrapolating on then-current crime trends, expected an explosion of offenders and started building prisons. In particular, the early data suggested the rise of "superpredators," a wave of juvenile delinquents that would flood the criminal justice system in the early 2000s. The wave, however, never happened and crime rates have fallen since 1991. Florida now has excess prison room, about 116,000 beds for 102,000 inmates - a number that's basically been flat for three years. Cutting back on these incarceration costs will save the state $15 million, and could cost up to 1,600 jobs.
The release of the 3 new jobs is exciting enough to create a whole festival about! The festival will be going on for the whole summer, all of July and August!
antibiotics, and preservatives, the beneficial micro-organisms present in
You start by sauteing a little garlic in olive oil. Then you add some butter for flavor.
2009-421.6 billion Naira
Recognizing, also, that the enemy will come against us through temptations to impede the Father’s Will from being completed, we also petition that He not permit any testing that goes beyond our ability to resist.
As things turn out, every one of these elements builds into a massive joke. The first thing makes the content comic and because this was put together basically in one draft, the story gets really zany. The dialogue pushed into these contrived rhymes sounds pretty silly. Then, the coup d’grace is the serious pretense of all the characters that grounds all the performances and keeps them from over-acting and begging for the laughs.
Bhishma’s selflessness
Also near Stockbridge and generally showing smaller pieces of contemporary sculpture is The Garden Gallery. The Gallery’s Summer Exhibition this year opens on 12 May and runs until 21 July (on Thursdays, Fridays and Saturdays, 11 – 5).
“I can’t prove it yet.” I replied.
It was a shock to hear that my maternal grandpa, Saba Yossef (Grandpa Joseph), passed away. In the past few years his condition had been slowly deteriorating, and he spent the last five months of his life in a hospital, fighting one infection after another (he contracted these infections courtesy of the hospital itself, where powerful bacteria are rampant and patient care is uneven, to say the least). But still, he was a fighter. This is a guy who evaded the Nazis when he was 12. He was a war veteran. He fought off colon cancer a decade ago. We kept expecting him to live somehow.
In the 1891 census George, Maria and Lily were living in Victoria – George is now noted as aged 48, a two year difference from his 1881 entry, and four years younger than he really was.
To completely clear away all the nits and lice, you should preferably implement a devoted head lice comb.
-How far that little candle throws his beams. So shines a good deed in a weary world.
Brooklyn Infringement Festival 2012 submissions deadline has passed. The lineup for this year’s festival, held the nights of May 3rd, 4th and 5th at Don Pedro, will be posted here on or around April 1st. If you would like to be notified by email of when the official BIF 2012 website is launched, send us an email with SUBSCRIBE in the subject line.
AND BIN LADEN IS DEAD! Which is why I am writing.....because I am so excited I can't sleep!!!!!!
Another favorite publisher of mine is Kids Can Press. A Paddling of Ducks: Animals in Groups from A to Z by Marjorie Blain Parker and Joseph Kelly is marvelously illustrated and creates groups that include a “Bask of Crocodiles” and a “Skulk of Foxes” to reinforce the alphabet and introduce a young reader to all manner of creatures from Yellow Jackets to zebra in a very entertaining fashion. Melanie Watt created Chester the cat, a rather self-centered feline, and his latest manifestation occurs in Chester’s Masterpiece ($18.95) in which she admonishes Chester not to copy other people’s writings as he attempts to write his own book. Will he write humor, action, drama, suspense, horror, science fiction, or romance? The results will be hilarious to any young reader who will begin to think about writing their own book, too! An older reader, age 10 to 12, will surely enjoy Evolution: How We and All Living Things Came to Be by Daniel Loxton ($18.95) with an excellent text and extraordinary computer-generated images, illustrations and photos that demonstrate how various species evolved over millions of years. Any youngster showing an interest in science will love this one.
And still more, later flowers for the bees,
Scrapbooking Classes are now commencing at ABSA!! This is an adult class using the new Kaisercraft 'Konstrukt' range to create a wonderful layout for that special young man in your life!!
I’m already not much of a “people person”. I love talking. I love being around people that I like. But, I don’t like most people.
1/4 cup reduced-fat mayonnaise
I love that. The good shot-givers get in and get out and it's over before the kid knows it. He even got to pick a prize from the prize bin.
He tried to pull his hand away, yet I clung to it, my voice hardening. “Why do you say that? You are everything to me.”
I stumbled across a upcoming card show a few weeks ago and thought I'd post it here for collectors if you live in the southeastern Pennsylvania, Maryland or Virginia. I didn't go to the first show in April, so I'm not sure how good of a show it will be card wise. I'm planning on attending Friday to check it out. It's not far from where I work and Friday has free addmission from 5-9pm. If its worthwile, I plan on attending Sunday, admission is eight dollars and autograph signers on Sunday will be Orioles from the 1966 World Series team.
On Sunday night, the boys' daddy and I were reading a parenting book while Babyboy played at our feet and Oldest and Middleson played outside. Suddenly daddy asked, "Why are we inside reading a parenting book instead of playing with the kids?" Good question daddio. It was then that I received the invitation to play football. Yep, at thirty-something I finally slightly understood how the game is played. The 30minutesontheboysturf turned into an hour of football fun. Even the neighbors joined us.
Exchange particles in the infinite subspace held the quarks in the sky
"Hell no! I'm talking about the tool that is your mind! Slice and dice baby, slice and dice!"
The last time I was up visiting she came down in her PJ and robe, asking if I would like to meet Dale.
Today when we took outfit shots, Husband told me he liked my tights. While he isn't stingy with compliments, he normally doesn't pin point on specific item that he likes. It kind of made me giggle.
Give or take a little, a book will cost me 3.50 $
So I had to dig deep to find a picture of Bronnie's chair. He had it upholstered in fabric from 1830. Of course he loves the old rips that have old repairs in the way of a spot hit with the darning needle. He likes to show these in a prominent space.
Further, I have lost the need to control. For one thing it is tiring to try to control other people. As a teacher, I tend to do that a lot. So, when I see that I am about to go into the 20th lecture about the exact same thing to a student, I have let go understanding that this student knows how the rules of my class works and what will happen. I just let life take place and let go. I am thankful for letting go of this. That doesn’t mean that the students run wild. I just do what is in my power to do. If they don’t turn in an assignment, I explain the consequences, and let them know that I will adhere to them. I am so thankful for this because this brings more of a piece of mind on a regular basis.
Jeff Beck Mixes Rock with Classical on New Solo Album
The result of all of this is that it’s very easy to create images of the working class that valorize closed-minded, bigoted, and destructive attitudes as part of working class culture. And that is exactly what Hilda ends up doing. She is designed to be a nasty and unpleasant woman who is cruel to those around her, suspicious and contemptuous of those from different backgrounds to her, and who, in the entire month of episodes I watched, basically never did a single nice thing for any other character at all. She is a horrible, horrible person with no redeeming character traits whatsoever.
* Move to the next spot and repeat as long as it takes to get good results.
This holiday seems to lead to lots of turmoil. I remember feeling sad not having a valentine to share the day with. Yes, it is a commercial holday. Yet what hasn't been commercialized? It's pervasive in our culture. Why not reclaim it to something better.
Our conversations sometimes go like this:
7. "I only date black women." (You think you're going to impress her because you're down, but saying that just makes it seem like black women are a "type.")
Oh, I know. "Senator."
75% Merlot, 13% Cabernet Sauvignon and 12% Petit Verdot
I’ll admit I watched this book for a bit before picking it up. There was talk of weak world building; about the similarities between the android and cyborg conditions. But when I received the audio Cd’s in the mail from fellow blogger Bookgoonie I thought, obviously, this was a sign I was meant to do this book…
* Paper Smooches stamp suggestions (Smoocheroos)
Wash and pat dry all the chicken parts. Place them on the baking sheet lined with wax paper.
When you wake up in the morning, take out the strips, style your hair, and ta-da, beautiful curls that will hold for a long time!
I did.
* Enterprises
What a cruel thing is war: to separate and destroy families and friends, and mar the purest joys and happiness God has granted us in this world; to fill our hearts with hatred instead of love for our neighbors, and to devastate the fair face of this beautiful world. ~Robert E. Lee, letter to his wife, 1864
P.S. Robert Morgan is the same poet who wrote "White Autumn." Remember the woman in the rocking chair with clay pipe hidden in the cabinet? Same poet. Here it is if you'd like a reminder: teresaevangeline.blogspot.com/2012/01/everything-is-ok-just-way-it-is.html
See you in 2011! We love you!!
he suspects is my boyfriend
She's been waiting and waiting and waiting for this day....so she could get a FACEBOOK account. But, she was in such a disarray when this big day arrived...that she totally forgot about it when she woke up and I had to ask her at 9am when she was going to get to going on it!
“I’m sorry that good-looking people like us made you throw up and feel bad about yourself. ” Zoolander 2001.
I have to say I’ve discovered something annoying about me. I even annoyed me.
One of the things that gets me excited about baking is when someone asked me to bake something for their special occasion, especially for a wedding. At first, the thought of baking hundreds of macarons with my schedule sounds really impossible and each time, I just can't say no for most of them. There is something about wedding that is just so magical and being asked to be a part of that is such an honor for me.
JamericanSpice
I felt the Sanctification and Temptation were pretty similar. They both had a tart nose and were followed by tart flavors but weren't particularly dry. The temptation may have had a bit more oak flavors but all in all they were both mostly just tart. I have bottles of both now so I'm looking forward to doing a side by side some time in the near future to better see the differences.
* Participating in other development-related activities, when
I have been so delinquent blogging lately! I believe it is mostly due to the holidays and things being very busy! Here is a photo from today of our little Eloise. She is a bundle of joy and Charlotte is really stepping into her role as a big sister nicely.
& LSH Members!
Generally, the efficient application of a floor seal or polish will increase the slip resistance of the floor surface. However, if the seal or polish is not applied correctly, or is allowed to become contaminated with soil or grit, it will not adhere to the surface properly, therefore reducing the slip resistance of the floor. Similarly, the slip resistance of a floor will reduce if they are allowed to become wet.
So if a customer ever complained about there not being enough alcohol in their drink, I'd snatch the drink right out of their hands and look them dead in the eye as I poured their drink down the sink. I would then grab the glass, set it on the bar and have the customer watch me remake their drink using the jigger. I'd inform them that it was the club's rules that every drink have a specific measure of alcohol in them. If they had problems tasting the alcohol, they could either order a double and pay for a double or drink somewhere else.
Than gather regret for the things I can't change now
Yup - built these myself. The dead space above? I am still going to be adding a fixed shelf that will be right next to the water valve. And I have a great idea for hair accessory storage mounted to the cabinet door. Coming soon!
I'm Wendy Janson - It's All About Stamping, and I'm the hostess again this week. I have a sketch challenge for you and am calling it the "Haul Out the Holly...It's Time to Decorate!" Challenge. The challenge is to use this very basic sketch, and "decorate" it! You can turn it on it's side or turn it upside-down or leave it like it is and then embellish or "decorate" it as much as you want! Take a look at what our design team has created this week:
Walta Info reports ("Addis to host 10th Annual Innovation Africa Digital Summit") that Ethiopia's Ministry of Communication and Information Technology (MoCTI) is to partner with Extensia Limited to bring the 10th Annual Innovation Africa Digital Summit to Ethiopia. This event, scheduled for 27 to 27 March next year, expects to bring together up to 350 leaders covering the African Information Communication Technology industry "including ministers, regulators, service providers and leading international solution providers".
Simple things can be forgotten when buying a builder home...like the fact that the contractors search high and low for the cheapest of the cheap when it comes to installing light fixtures and doorknobs in our homes. I think the brass doorknob comes in at a whopping $5.49 in most Canadian hardware stores, compared to a decent black knob ringing in around $35.00 and up.
The very nice lady continues to huff and puff, and in about two minutes I bring her two piping hot meatballs. Luckily, these are much better and she's pleased that she gets an extra one to take home. Our executive chef brought out the steak himself and apologized profusely. The ladies were charmed. We took off the meatballs and the steak and the very nice lady who had done all that huffing and puffing actually left me $30. On a bill that was only about $30.
Gold is also trying to establish an uptrend but lost 1.1% on the week.
Quick refresher: Using the silks looks like this….
4 days before Christmas and Nick has another transplant appointment tomorrow.We have been going to Gainesville every 6 months for what seems like forever. Tomorrow's appointment is A little different as we Should get to know weather or they think its time to start the actual evaluation process. I know this is wrong but I am just ready for this part to be over. Deep inside I hope they tell us that he should start the process.
brain damage
The general public consensus seems to be that children should not have the right to own property at all, even if that property was obtained with their own money. Also, many people seem to feel that children complaining about their parents is disrespectful and is an offense punishable by destruction of the property that doesn't even belong to them. That is discouraging for all the children out there who are being mistreated by the very people who brought them into this world.
Top of your bag and your bag lining: 3/4 yard of accent fabric (mine is dots)
I did pass my ARPS as you can see in a previous blog post, and we produced some super location images during our shoot as you will see in future posts. So a big thank you again to Holly, you do really work hard and push me that extra mile for which I am very grateful :)
Pink Grandma - Nana - stirs from her slumber, unaware of the nocturnal separation. She smiles without seeing, squeezes my hand without knowing I’ve clutched it back. I move to embrace her, lingering a while, careful not to damage her frail frame. When at last she sighs I know it is the end and I hug her closer. Pink Nana dies, for the second time, in the safety of my arms.
Not that I took great care of my hair. I was not nice to my hair. I started by putting Sun-In on my head when I was in seventh grade. I used Dippity Doo when I rolled my hair.
One of the main factors in making the decision to search is often the perception one has about how one’s adoptive parents might react. Kimberly Stone writes further about her decision not to search: “I also feel it would hurt my adoptive parents, whom I adore and am very close to, and who adore me.”
May will be a lot less busy, or at least I hope so a little bit. Who am I kidding?? I really want to spend some more time in the gym to get ready for the summer. Gotta to be fly in my swimsuit.
The final clue to these behind closed door manoeuvrings is the indecent haste and effort with which the senior members of the EU commission have tried to get involved in it all. We've had Barrosso sticking his oar in for weeks and being ignored as the Power shifts towards Merkel and Sarkozy. Now Baroness Ashton has ramped up the noise and sense of self-imposed importance by commenting publicly on the UK's diplomatic spat with Iran, urging other EU countries to get involved. The "don't forget we're still here" undertones of her timing can not be ignored.
Sanjay Dutt…. Kancha
Traditional breeding methods is what they call it when they are talking about plants. They are then called recombinant organisms, and we have been eating them, because they have been sold since 1994.
She likes to be romanced, so I whispered, “I love you,” into her ear right as I began to slide my dick inside of her. Honestly, I wanted to leave that part of so bad, but my readers deserve the whole truth. Despite only having had sex once in the last five months, the condom turned me into a marathon man, and we had sex for almost an hour. All in the missionary position. I told you she liked it traditional (something she did get past–more on that later). I don’t remember her feeling extra tight or anything, but she definitely wasn’t anywhere near loose. She was super wet from the days of anticipation, so I slid right in, too.
Elizabeth’s method for cooking all sorts of fish:
Both Jim Rowley and the late Spencer Williams are perfect recipients of the award.
A few summer's ago we made a deal: eat all summer long from only the food co-op & the farmer's markets minus a Costco list of dog food, coffee, flour, sugar, and a few other items we couldn't afford to buy locally. We did okay but it was far from perfect. Part of it was us, part of it was a financial issue (suppose that is us too), & part was a timing issue with getting enough food from the markets and having it last (the cheaper & more variety at the co-op 1x a month: the more pricey & hit-or-miss farmer's markets 1-2x a week).
Is bullying then declining?
for crows
Like I said, the small words are the ones that pack the biggest punches, and "heist" is no different. Dictionary.com defines the noun "heist" as "a robbery or hold up." However, for those of you who are writers and/or enjoy these types of movies and books, the word "heist" means so much more. Traditional heist stories involve a group of people all working together to steal something. Some examples include The Perfect Score and The Italian Job. These are appealing to me because there is more than just stealing going on. There is a sense of togetherness and a sense of identity. Everyone knows his or her role, and they all must work together perfectly to pull the heist off. I can't hear the word "heist" and not smile.
We went to our show then my Parents wanted to watch the Munchkin over night, so we dropped the Munchkin off afterwards. We then proceeded to drive home where I am informed we will be playing tonight. Ouuuu I was excited. He had picked out undergarments earlier that day and I was wearing my garter, hoes, and a thong of His choice. I picked out the rest of my clothes and He just approved them. With His choice of the garter and hose I figured He had plans for me.
OK, it's Day 5 of the National Blog Post Month and it's the weekend. I'm really busy with the kids being home, judo practice, parties etc and I'm sure you are busy too, so I'm going to try and keep it brief.
Then they spend the next three months… what would you call it? - tending to these picked grapes. Once every three or four weeks they sell a bunch or two. For the rest of the time they use up ten to twelve hours a day, every day, just… I suppose… being near the grapes. It’s sort of like a vigil, except with a monumentally large amount of swearing, bickering, starting and stopping of engines, shifting of polystyrene boxes and thrashing of corrugated iron.
Officials in Hancock County became aware of the situation Wednesday after the victim’s mother contacted the West Virginia State Police. The victim’s mother told an officer that Nally had stated that he would kill any officer that showed up to arrest him. The woman also told police that Nally threatened to kill the woman and himself.
I am a princess.
One last turn for Sorscha and now yes, with only one Widowmaker and no jacks, it just wasn’t going to happen. Assasination was very unlikely (the thing with playing in such a tight surface) and she just tried to hurt the Destroyer which she did just a little bit. After her raging attack she was with one focus left, not enough for a wind rush spell.
Green?
To my many over seas friends – this Blog is not meant to take aim at you – it is meant to point out that we American’s have given away our way of life that has supported us for the last century. I know many people in the UK who say that their jobs are at risk or have been taken away too.
Bye.Cya
I had figured on losing. It didn't bother me. But what did bother was the waste. And what I can only call an oppressive presence. Some of you may scoff at me for this, but I really do believe when we create a place that is intended for waste and/or sin, a darkness can and will reside there. And you can usually see it in the people who are there.
As it turned out, casual conversation came easily as we unloaded on each other about the frustrations of work and life in general. I got to know about her family (four kids and a husband), her likes (Neil Young) and dislikes (George W. Bush), her hopes (retirement) and her fears (that I drive like a maniac). We have become what I consider to be friends.
While I had a moment today, I read an article in the latest Mary Jane’s Farm magazine, about a couple who have built a whole business around the idea of gratitude. It struck me, because of the content of the article, but also because I had just read another article about changing your attitude from one of questioning to one of recognizing things to be thankful for. I love this idea, by the way – the notion that we, ALL of us, have things to be thankful for, if only we take the time to recognize and identify them. Not that everyone’s life is just peachy every moment of every day, of course. It’s just that, in the midst of even the worst tragedy or the most difficult times, there are small comforts, or people who care for us, or even just beautiful sunsets that we can appreciate and for which we can give thanks.
That's what we as in the autism community need to do to effect societal change.
Elda Mary Kley (1924-2005), daughter of Lewis and Mary Kley.
The answer is: it depends on what you are selling and how you define your ‘local’ newspaper.
though winter does not officially start for another couple weeks, it sure feels like it has already arrived here. and it looks like it too, as we have already had a couple of snowy days.
Everyone will wear a dress. Everyone will have some type of wedding ceremony. Everyone will have some type of party and most likely there will be some type of cake that the two of you will cut. So as you can see all weddings will have the same elements, but it's how you tailor these elements to reflect your style and your likes that will make your wedding unique.
:).....smiling my toofless grin.
9. Push th' Little Daisies 2:48
so vacant, deep and cold
The Tips
This is the conversation Benson and I had the other morning.
Illustrated by way of: Black & White Photographs; Facsimiles; Black & White Drawings;
Hold her.
Here’s a novel thought, why doesn’t someone just make straightforward rock n’ roll. In the last twenty- five years (if Mick’s new group Carbon/ Silicon is his answer, pray that Jah sends him more songs) only the U.K. band Wire has for me sporadically reached that same blast furnace intensity that was The Clash’s calling card. Everybody’s so obsessed with experimenting out on the fringe of electronica, funk, rap, and world music that we forgot about the template that has never failed when done right: two guitars, bass and drums. What we are still desperate for in 2008 is a real rock band. We need a group that could invent their own I Fought the Law, a group that plays every night like it might be their last. I read Mojo, and have listened to Franz Ferdinand, The Kaiser Chiefs and all the other latest Next Big Things that they trumpet about each month. What eventually happens is that they all wind up swiggin’ Dom Perignon in St. Bart’s with a supermodel on their arm, that’s the only thing you can learn from The Mick Jagger School of Rock. You can have U-2 with all their managers and accountants, I’m looking for something real, something that doesn’t have a marketing plan in place before they even plug in for the recording session.
Sure, Jesus enjoyed a good bite to eat among friends every now and then. Just look at how much he and his Father talked about banquets and feasts. Jesus did some of his best ministry around food, but this time was different. He refused stomach food because he was feasting on spiritual food that is far superior to it, and nobody in their right mind fills up on hot dogs when a porterhouse steak is on the table.
Black Forest Gateau was done last year, Red Velvet cake was for friendship day, Peach torte was for no good reason, Pineapple cheese-cake was just-like-that, Mango pastry went with a courtesy visit to a relative, Citrus cake for an in-law’s birthday……honestly my choices were getting limited in terms of cakes/tortes. Googled a lot and suggested recipes to the hub, each went into the recycle bin with a shake of the head.
Are you guys ready for my thought on this?! Ok, let’s go.
My wonderful mother came and removed my sister and I from that junior high, transferring us to another junior high that would be funneled into the high school we would attend. So, in October, I became the "new" girl in a very different environment. This junior high was an old established school, one in which the girls' mothers, aunts and grandmothers had attended. I would receive the name "River Rat" which would stay with me through high school. Our city is divided North and South by the Colorado River and since the bus carried us across the river from South Austin, we were "River Rats".
d. Your healer is sick
Well, that's the idea anyway...
Cloud has seen a significant uptake because of the benefits that it offers to organisations. Cloud solutions remove hardware costs, replacing them with per users cost. This is especially beneficial to smaller organisations as it allows them to access enterprise grade technologies with much lower start up costs. Furthermore, the cloud allows businesses to quickly respond to its needs by adding and removing licenses with minimal fuss. Furthermore, in most cases these services have been built with high availability in mind allowing organisations to mitigate business continuity risks.
BONG! BONG! Great Tom started to sound the hour of midnight from the south-west tower of St Paul’s. As the last chime echoed into stillness, the animals bowed their heads, knelt, worshipped. Glorianna too slipped forward onto her knees. It was physically impossible for her to do so now, in her weakened state, so she must be dreaming, she thought. But it was a good dream, a dream she didn’t want to end.
Shearing had a daughter, Wendy, with his first wife, the former Trixie Bayes, whom he married in 1941. The marriage ended in divorce in 1973 and two years later he married singer Ellie Geffert.
The Baby Trap – Janine Wood
State of Wonder by Ann Patchett. I could not put this down. The story is so suspenseful, and its ruminations on women and fertility struck a chord.
- New global connections available via New York, Washington, and Istanbul -
1073. Cookies @ Mom & Dad’s (Pottstown, PA) 1:12 p.m.
Put the slices on a oven rack. Bake for 7 minutes, turn around and another 7 minutes.
Polunsky Unit/Death Row, Livingstion, TX
No point in trying to catch up on what we've been up to, too busy.
I need His joy in the morning to radiate through me when I feel fatigued and grumpiness starts setting in.
music I once hammered out
Today Ivan got fixed :( Poor little dude. I took him in the morning and then picked him up at the end of the day. This was him after. He was so doped up that he didn't know what to do. He couldn't even walk home. He is heavy and so I got two arm workouts in today.
Seen with my own eyes.
4 secret
Sadat X – The X Factor
Unfortunately, you will gnash your teeth trying to figure out the details of the company's history, as many fun facts are as cleverly hidden as Waldo. Each page of the site has big arrows left and right, which you can use to move forward and backward in time. But each one also has tiny arrows which you can use to find more info from the same time period. It took me a whole lot longer than I should have spent on the site in toto to discover the second set of arrows.
Sorry for the delay but we are ready to go for this week's challenge! Thank you for your White After Labor Day entries, the simplicity of white as a background is just wonderful on all your creations!
1.) Send a thank you to the person who nominated you and include their link.
7.Non- bloggers can just mail me the recipe name,recipe and a picture (not larger then 300px) please on creativesonu@gmail.com.
Grand Theft Auto: San Andreas Cheats (PC)
TOO, You liked it I bet./
All goals need to be clear and specific whether they are short or long-term goals. Because in the end you want the goals to be measurable and motivating enough for you to achieve the end result. My goal for that summer was to learn how to climb a mountain every weekend that was not anything less than 300 meters high and 5k in distance.
- Set daily, weekly, monthly, and yearly goals to help keep businesses moving forward and focusing on the larger goals to prioritize everyday tasks
The 2nd was nice.
8: More and more new turntables being made and sold.
Beigelite Accentuating Cream (Senna Cosmetics)
CONGRATULATIONS, Person’s Name, on making the bold decision to work from
While earlier this spring my sister and her husband bought morels, they have plenty of their own now. A week ago Saturday Dale harvested some 65 morels from one location. Morels are sprouting two weeks earlier and are more abundant than normal this year, probably due to the unseasonably warm April, he speculates. The season has nearly ended now.
Two weeks later, Laura feels good as her enemy has not found her. Simon asks her to come help him decorate an estate he just bought. She agrees but is shocked as the estate was owned by her cousin and she and her late dad lived there. She even married here but her husband said they never wed as the parson was a fake. He used her as his sex prisoner. Simon admires Laura’s spirit that was not broken. A storm forces them to spend the night there. Laura and Simon make love. Later Laura learns Westwick was murdered allegedly by his missing courtesan Sabine. Simon plans to find the real killer.
I tried medication after medication for pain, not yet diagnosed with anything, I kept telling my doctor’s that I wanted to be pain free. Unfortunately, for anyone who is diagnosed with fibromyalgia, the only way to diagnose is to rule out everything else. The first torture was an EMG. They use little electric pulses on all your nerves in one arm and leg. Then they stick needles into you. Enough said. I went through so many MRI’s, some of them painful because of the position the technician put me in. I was too stupid to complain, sobbing at the end of one of my hand MRI’s and ended up not doing the other one. I endured a spinal tap, that was supposed to be pain-free, but hurt so bad, even my neurologist, who used the smallest needle possible and had been doing them for over 20 years was surprised at my reaction. I was sent to physical therapy for my knees and snapped when the physical therapist suggested that my symptoms sounded like fibromyalgia. I couldn’t even do the exercises and stretches that he asked me to do. They were too painful and they made me feel worse. Then came the headaches. I was in the emergency room twice, vomiting uncontrollably from the pain. I even went to my primary care physicians office and although he wasn’t available, thought another doctor would be able to help me. She said very distinctly “I cannot give you any more narcotics”. That wasn’t what I asked for. I just wanted to feel better, to be rid of the debilitating headache. My neurologist finally determined that muscle spasms in my neck were causing the headaches and put me on a muscle relaxer, Baclofen. The combination of Lyrica and Cymbalta was supposed to take care of the pain, the depression and the fatigue. Not even close. The Lyrica combined with my inability so far to commit to an exercise program has caused me to gain 40 pounds in 9 months. Almost like being pregnant, without the reward of a cute little baby to cuddle and without any idea when the weight gain will stop. I’m afraid to go off the Lyrica because it does help with the uncontrollable muscle movements but switched the Cymbalta for Amitryptaline and Fluoxetine to save money. I sleep better now, but still feel unrested even if I do get 8 hours.
Impulsive aggression can be inherited.
Our dining room sat lonely and empty for over 2 years after we moved into our home. Sadly I don't have before pictures of the room but picture a big empty room with a dog crate in it and you're pretty much there. We own one proper table - a farmhouse table that we love and are sentimentally attached to as our first collective furniture purchase as a couple. It was sitting out in our breakfast nook where it fit perfectly and made more sense as we rarely have formal dinners that necessitate the use of the "formal" dining room. Hence the empty and sad dining room.
Brooklyn loves to do battle over real estate. Whether over projects as grandiose as sports arenas and skyscrapers, or as modest as what shade of brown to paint the landmarked houses of an historic district, dedicated denizens of the borough are always rekindling the contest between progress and preservation.
(Second random aside: What is the deal with Warner Home Video releasing Young Justice in single discs? I thought we abandoned the single disc release ten years ago. Are people actually still willing to hack over $3.75 an episode in 4-episode-per-disc chunks? Even Amazon’s instant video for the series has a better option, which is saying something. The last multi-season DC title that I can think of was the DC shows from ten years ago, and those all had perfect season DVD releases, so I must repeat… what’s the deal? If a season set’s not announced by the end of the first season’s airing, I just might have to invest in Amazon’s instant video release which doesn’t nearly look as pretty sitting in my video folder in comparison to on my shelf. Guess it’s a balancing act between aesthetics and practicality.)
Out from Boneville (released in 2005, or, with the way-back-then version, 1995) is the first chronicle out of a surprisingly weak nine (the final one, Crown of Horns, being released in 2009/2004) that basically started everything. It follows Fone, Phoney, and Smiley Bone as they all get run out of what seems to be their hometown of Boneville. They are all separated and lost in an uncharted desert where Fone fortunately makes a path for himself after finding “cigar butts” Smiley left behind. One by one, the three find their way into a deep forest valley inhabited with wonderfully terrifying creatures. Eventually, the cousins find themselves again at a farmstead owned by the hard-hitting Gran’ma Ben and her granddaughter, Thorn, Fone Bone’s future love focus. But little does this threesome know that there are dark forces hunting them down and their adventures are only beginning!…
I wish we could be more than friends,
Eastern Conference:
The one thing I focused on most, during the fitness test, was form. I am really trying not to be concerned about the number of reps, but with how many I do well. When I start to lose my composure, I know that I’ve done enough. I feel like that’s how injuries happen.
Dr. Lippert
I'm going to think about things I want to blog about
7 Space Diary 1 1:51
One definition of bhakti is given in the authoritative book Nārada-pañcarātra:
The president also said his administration is trying to make peace with the Taliban:
7/10 this time, lucky guess aside.
1 bar of smelly brown soap for laundry
It was almost the holiday show season and I had to put the project aside to concentrate on getting ready for shows. Come January though, the project was still waiting for me so I started thinking about it again.
My first pair of expensive heels. I bought them for myself when I landed the job that I'd been working so hard to get.
As a parent, I know that finding affordable and creative gifts for teachers can be challenging.
Hanging by a moment (here with you)
We have had to say good-bye to Susan and Dawn. We wish them the very best and hope to see them often in the blogging world.
I called up the beautiful girl.
And to think I was stupid enough to close my blog due to a few "make you guilty" e-mails.
My teenage years certainly influenced The Hunt. Like most, my adolescence swung like a pendulum between the extremes of self-discovery and self-forfeiture, the latter of which happened whenever I was peer-squeezed into one of those false molds society expects you to fit into. So much of Gene’s existence – shaving his arms and legs, repressing laughter – metaphorically captures the way teens are often forced to act and think in socially-acceptable ways. As one reviewer put it, Gene’s existence “captures the excruciating experience of high school, where it feels as if every gesture receives close scrutiny by the entire student body.” I like that.
How do they do it, you ask? Each model’s photo has been embedded with invisible digital watermarks to ensure they do not detract from the photos.
I think Robyn, My Pink Stamper, and Maria are having fun coming up with creative post assignments for us! Our post challenge this month:
Come on! That's just 12 and a half days of a thousand words - which is about two hours' steady writing each weekday until school holidays bring all the chicks home to roost once more.
strong vs. weak becoming moot in this context.
See all that grated chocolate? You better be admiring that darn grated chocolate.
His motives were wrong
It's OBF time again and here I am late to post again! I'm also actually running late heading down to the OBF... No parade for me this year. Grrr...
*Dental Chews
I went in for my interview and there were no questions, no reviewing of my resume...in fact, I was led to the back of the store where an empty display was and about 75 items scattered on the floor. My interview was to merchandise the product and get critiqued by Zora and her two other employees. People, this was a lot harder than you may think. For starters I got the crap in the store that I walk past everytime I go in there; I got the fluorescent pink, blue, green, and orange stupid stuff like juvenile piggy banks, polka dotted picture frames, fake daisies in vases, etc. I worked on it for an hour and fifteen minutes and really struggled. In fact, the peg board attached to my display was halfway broken so I couldn't hang things where I had originally wanted. I was super aggravated. I was critiqued and they didn't say much but they asked me what I thought and I said "I don't love it." And I told them why. I can easily decorate the things I like but if you give me a pile of Made in China crap I am lost. In fact after the interview I was texting with Caroline and Carmen about how much the interview sucked and how I felt like I had blown it. I even went for beers with the neighbor so she could tell me how awesome I am and make me feel better.
There are, however, a couple of sugar-on-top phrases – one that elicited a smile, the other an out-loud belly laugh – that I just have to share with you because they speak to the humorous nature of the author and the style in which she writes. (No holier-than-thou guilt trip. Hatmaker is totally relate-able and so funny.)
This is C.C. Designs Swiss Pixie Bouquet Birgitta and tree swing digital images that I have merged together, to make this gorgeous set. Isn’t she pretty!!! The papers I used on my card are from MME: Dolled Up. Unfortunately at this time the paper is no longer available on the ATS site, but that just means they are making room for more goodies!!! YEAH!!!
As a matter of fact, 25 Viper teams were responsible for 9,000 checkpoints along the American road system, last year alone and that number, both of teams and checkpoints, will be increasing.
"Well then, can I keep you?"
Are you swooning as hard as I am over that quilt? I don't love all quilts, but holy moly, Allison is amazing. Her quilts are always incredible. The colors in this quilt are perfect. If you quilt, she has a pattern for this quilt on her blog! I want to learn.
NEXT: Headhunters
Children don't need rules, judgment, manipulation (they can be very easy for us to manipulate, because they want to please us), or control. They need connection and freedom. Freedom to self-design their own lives. Children love us as their parents, not because we're "good" parents, but because they are our child. (This would explain why children can have pretty terrible parents, yet still love them.)
We always start class with 5 minutes of meditation. We did something different that night, we did 12 minutes of guided meditation led by Jon Cabat-Zinn. I cried for the first 12 minutes of class. I think between all the events of the day, making dinner for a family with a new baby girl and then pondering "the breath" and letting it all go. Not focusing on any thing other than the moment. Thinking of breath as rolling waves and our mind as a little boat riding those waves. It was impossible for me to focus on my breath but I was glad to have the guide bring me back to it. Yoga that night was so helpful. My teacher mostly teaches Ananda yoga but incorporates some flow and then on the first Monday of each month we do Yin yoga. This night we did some Ananda practice and the teacher says that in Ananada there is an affirmation with each pose. She only used a couple affirmations but they were incredibly helpful:
Breham questioned why such vast sums could be paid to Razak Baginda’s company. The €114 million obtained by Ombak Laut, he said, was more than the amount paid by France to all of its primary school teachers for a year. He also revealed that DCNS’s former finance director had written memos in which he alleged that €31 million of the €114 million had been used for “commercial engineering”, a term Breham said had no legal meaning.
What Mom declared forbidden became increasingly random. She decided I couldn’t go see Phantasm because of the tagline, “If this one doesn’t scare you, you’re already dead,” yet she had no problem dropping me and two friends off to catch Dawn of the Dead, a movie so gory that it was released unrated, at a seedy little theater whose employees never checked IDs. If you’ve ever seen both of these films, you’d know that you must be already dead, because Phantasm isn’t all that scary, but Dawn of the Dead is one of the most brutal and vicious movies ever made. Even more perplexing was her decision to forbid me from seeing The Gauntlet, a fairly minor (and stupid) movie in the Clint Eastwood canon, but simply something I had expressed an interest in watching. Yeah, that movie was rated R, but I’d seen rated R movies before, including Blazing Saddles, which they took me to see (if you’ve never seen Blazing Saddles, let me just tell you that the liberal use of the ‘N-word’ would probably shock modern audiences). Mom even had no problem with dropping me off at the Southgate to allow me to engage in the illegal act of sneaking from theater to theater to watch all the movies playing at this four auditorium theater for the price of one ticket. During this time I remember seeing such gory movies as Death Race 2000, where drivers compete in a cross-country race and earn bonus points for running over pedestrians. Still, for some unfathomable reason, while sneaking into movies without paying was okay, The Gauntlet was forbidden. And of course, being more rebellious at the age of 14, I went and saw it anyway, telling Mom I was gonna see something else. But, because I still respected Mom’s law, I later informed her of my crime, and was promptly grounded.
The links to the other parts are below.
We went to the house we were at (whch was no particular house in general), running underneath it (it was on stilts) and then to the back patio so we could watch the plane hit. It was no longer at the “north” end of the cul-de-sac, but was now at the “west” end (azimuth of -90 degrees to its original position) in the backyard of the house.
Sometimes it’s just fun to see a pack of super heroes lunging right at the reader and this is a grand example of that! The energy explosion in the background already ramps up the intensity, but the kicker is Superman in the foreground, grimacing, eyes aglow! Man, you do NOT want to piss Superman off!
I spoke with a high school coach early this week who related to me the tale of one of her recent alumni who joined an NCAA riding program this fall and is already planning to transfer to a school closer to home next semester and ride in an IHSA program. The reason? The NCAA program wasn’t a good fit for her.
As the blame game continues to engulf politics, with neither side agreeing on any measure to get the country out of trouble, except for trivial half measures, one thing is obvious. You can’t figure out how to fix bad tings until you know why they happened. This applies to society but also to our personal lives. Bad things cause pain, suffering and confusion. They overturn the rhythm of normal life. Fear and anger surface, breaking apart a person’s emotional picture of reality. By “emotional reality” I mean the assumption that your existence can be calm, secure, prosperous, and unthreatened. Different as they are, a terrorist attack, bankruptcy, and a diagnosis of cancer are all bad things that create the same responses inside us.
Howard's sister told us he was so proud of his quilt he asked caregivers at his retirement center to hang it on the wall for all to enjoy.
* Sales & Marketing Manager (National and International Accounts)
She placed her cheek next to his. “Let me hear it. Just once before it’s over.”
Before we get to far into the heart of the blog, the Cross Country championship season so far in 2009, I would like to make a special mention/congratulations to the first American to win the New York City Marathon in 27 years, Meb Keflezighi. Meb dropped a quality field one by one en route to a 2:09.15 win over Robert Cheruiyot. An American had not won New York since Alberto Salazar won in 1982 and this was a major accomplishment in what has been a banner year for American long distance running.
No. It was not. In fact it was not positioned, so to speak. On a 200 tdi Discovery, there's an exhaust hanger just behind the axle on the rear near-side. Behind the hanger, a small (trivial) silencer box and a couple of feet of pipe. In my case, not. Nothing behind the hanger. My silencer back-box had gone to join the army of rusty, forlorn vehicle parts that adorn our roadsides. I have no idea where, as to when, within the last um, seven to ten days.
I met up with the lovely Lesley Lowe again yesterday and she brought over lots of wonderful donations for the needy for Christmas. She also brought these two lovely quilts to be donated and they will brighten the lives of two little children with a warm hug.
His outstanding quality is dribbling. More specifically, it’s picking the ball up in midfield, driving forward, beating his marker, drawing defenders and creating space where once there were massed ranks of defenders. For a long time he seemed unwilling to take on that responsibility, and for all his potential I thought Diaby would never be do it consistently.
My New book An Emerging Spirituality is out now on the kindle for just .99 cents and 10.00 for a paperback.
“In people with C.T.E.,” writes Kristof, “an abnormal form of a protein accumulates and eventually destroys cells throughout the brain, including the frontal and temporal lobes. Those are areas that regulate impulse control, judgment, multitasking, memory and emotions.”
All callers at the new central building of the Minneapolis Public Library, whether they enter it by telephone or in person, are greeted by trained librarians at the Information Desk. They answer quick reference questions, directing other to the proper subject departments.
4. Tequila (2:18)
9. The Meaning Of Christmas
To demonstrate this point, examine Ultimate Bet. If you registered for Ultimate Bet with no Utimate Bet Rakeback 3 years ago, you can not get rakeback as Ultimate Bet will decline to retag your account for rakeback. This is plainly an error of judgement as a player will often leave that site in order to get rakeback elsewhere thus causing the site to lose hold of a raking player.
Suffers not any one to pass her way,
“Say.” She answered hesitantly.
RAB
Working on these documentaries should be rewarding in many ways.
2.-Pattern of anergy with high amount of CD5 Bright on CD8 (T8)
"Oh. Well. Aspirin then"
I can not believe how angry I am over a TV show. I had trouble sleeping last night, and when I woke up this morning I had this nagging unhappy feeling. I was like, what is this? So I mentally went through the negatives of yesterday, hmm..doctor still suggesting I might need blood pressure medication and wants me to get an MRI I can't afford (not pleasant, but I'm employing strategies to try and avoid both, so I don't think that's it)....cat threw-up on the floor (yeah well what's new)...and then my mind arrived at the X Factor, the elimination of Drew (yep that's it), the cause of the feeling.
Who knows. I'm a blogger. I should be expected to do that. Oh well. It is what it is.
the lemon juice and zest.
"The only people that would have heard were the EDL.
This summer, my travels have been relatively close to home: Toronto, Kemptville, Quebec City. But it's nowhere near BJ and his gyrating. I don't think I'll ever be someone who would travel the world following a band. I know there are people out there (and probably in this blogosphere) who would but it's just not me. BJ has to come to me. And under a mid-August night, he did and I loved every minute of it. It's just too bad the restraining order keeps me so far away from him.
We stopped at Bonneville Salt Flats which was really cool. Literally.
Weekly joy: Cuddle time with Felicity. She really only cuddles if the TV is on, so sometimes I let her watch Dora or a little bit of a Disney movie, so I can trick her into sitting on my lap.
1. "Bot" - his yellow dog Spot
But should the Council really be permitting its navvies to set up an encampment in St Andrew Square? The whole area now looks rather tawdry and, as we have seen from the recent problems at Dale Farm, once established, these sort of unauthorised developments can be somewhat difficult and expensive to remove. But perhaps these costs have already been fully budgeted for now that the project is finally being properly managed and we are promised no more financial overuns?
Add the lime juice and continue heating the mixture, stirring gently, until the cream curdles.
Caitlin also finds consolation in her new surroundings. She finds she has been placed on a hidden island in the Hudson River—Pollepel—amidst an elite coven of teenage vampires, boys and girls alike, 24 in all, including her. She learns that this is a place for outcasts, just like her, and as she meets her new best friend, Polly, and begins her training in elite vampire combat, she realizes that she might finally have a place to call home.
Watch the a cappella version of "Gravity" below. (Aren't you glad someone was recording the performances for us?)
1/4 tsp of kosher salt
This year he wanted to have a Spiderman birthday party. It is really hard finding Spiderman party supplies, especially birthday invites (which I usually make). Cricut does not to my knowledge have a cartridge with Spiderman on it so this is what we both came up with. Instead of finding a computer image we used Spiderman tatoo's!!!! I know, cheap cheap cheap. I made 3 cards and I still have enough for a banner and thank you cards. There were 16 image on the tatoo sheet that we got at our local dollar tree. And of course, everything was made from my scraps.
- Buy a cheap shower curtain or shower liner to put under the highchair for easy cleanup.
The company offered a prize for the invention of a machine able to roll cigarettes. Until this point in time, they had been hand-rolled. The grand prize was won by James Bonsack with his 1880/81 invention. The machine was not reliable and all but one of the large tobacco manufacturers declined to buy the machine. The machine was eventually bought by James Buchanan Duke in 1885 and used it to great success.
My weight loss came to a screeching halt with the last program change. I loved the idea behind the program, loved the fact that I did not need to count fruit, just watch portions of them, and I loved the flexibility the plan gave me. The plan changed my thoughts on carbs entirely. Limiting them became a new (HARD) habit for me. I started to listen to my body more than ever- something very NEW to me and I enjoyed getting to know what foods made me feel better, and kept me full longer.
When she didn't die, we decided to name her Lucky.
Ensure that all employees know the organization’s vision and goals. They must be knowledgeable about what business the company is in, where they are now and where they intend to be in a year or 5 years time. Stress on factors as to, why it’s good to work at the organization and what benefits are available for the employee. Empower managers and executives to make effective decisions and communicate it well. A happy employee will contribute immensely making the vision a reality.
“It was pretty entertaining because most of the other work was either behind glass or a sculpture and most people didn’t even see this work until they got in the room and turned around and saw it,” said Faler.
wailing howls screech as we’re
Going to the movies
Such applications are for registration of the ownership of registered charges in the Subsidiary Register. Section 8 (b) (ii) of the Registration of Title Act 1964 and Rule 224(ii) of the Land Registration Rules 1972 to 2009 refers.
1. My God
*Dorie's Note 1: Dorie suggests, if you have the time, to wrap the cake well and leave it on the counter to ripen the flavors for a day before serving.
Not long ago, “American lager” meant a pale, thin, fizzy, soda-like substance. Compared to its Bavarian or Czech ancestors, the US brews seemed watered down, diluted to nearly homeopathic “no active ingredient” levels.
Here in the Philippines, we have an MRT (Metro Rail Transport) which if not jampacked with the working class, is not working at all. It goes all the way from the north of Metro Manila — North Avenue / Trinoma mall to the busy and ever stressful south — Makati / Taft Avenue. This summer when I began my internship, I never realized riding the MRT will be one, if not the most, of the things I’d have difficulty dealing with. I recall my boss asking me in my job interview, “Will you be okay with the distance of the office to your house?”, which I proudly answered “Yes sir, of course”. Now that I’m already where I wanted to be two months ago in that job interview, I feel like recoiling. It’s truly a massive challenge to be waking up at 5:30 in the morning, something that I have rarely done in my life, maybe the last time was when I was still in high school when I still cared about the school bus not leaving me. The waking up is not the most arduous task yet. It’s really the battle for space in the MRT, no contest. So let me just tell you tips that I can share and have learned in my almost two weeks of dealing with the MRT and its irksome passengers. I may not be the expert, but I may have been through the worst.
We're only two weeks into January & I was wondering, how many of you have signed up for a swap or a quilt along? There are some great ones like the Swoon Along or the Sew Red Blog Hop. The first swap for me this year is going to be Mouthy Stitches which is going to be great craic! The theme is for a zipped pouch & there are 90 of us poised & ready, just waiting to hear who are partners are! Here is my inspiration mosaic:
For a complete makeup of your eyes, a range that's been perfectly adapted to modern fashion
The Glyndebourne chorus were on very good form as were the London Philharmonic under Enrique Mazzola - simple and uncluttered, letting the voices shine and the action speak for itself.
up there had different plans for me. Every time I started rewriting or planning the outline, it was dismissed by my inner editor as being too mediocre, too clichéd, too stereotypical. My inner editor constantly shouted, “Try something different. Go for the unusual. ”
Here’s what JTV has to say about the line:
But the highlight of the trip has been by far the visit to Titanic Belfast, the brand new exhibition centre and largest tribute in the world to the stricken liner. The building itself was so impressive, made up of 4 bow-shaped sections, each the exact height of the hull of the ship when it was being built. You honestly cannot get enough of a sense of the height until you are right by them.
As you can see, I’m an absolute hippie in the kitchen. I keep my measurements loose and welcome the happy accidents that follow.
us and them
Turning I had bent over to grab my suitcase, I hopped he would make this easy; I had known it wouldn’t be though. I had felt his hand close on my wrist, stopping my movements I looked up into his eyes.
The human capability for vision is amazing because we think we understand it enough to duplicate the process, only to realize our duplication is much less efficient than our inspiration.
However, rather than diving into evolutionary biology/cladistics which isn't my area, I would like to look at some examples from the OUMNH collection and highlight some of the (to me) unexpected aspects of their morphology and the possible functions of such structures. I will however give some links to factsheets which provide details of the characteristics placing these species/genera in their currently accepted orders. Firstly, the frankly bizarre Walliserops trifurcatus with its unmistakeable trident...
Jane has a simple yet unusual construction. I would describe it as a raglan hybrid. Yet, it is super simple to knit and is very sparing on yarn!
Both sets feature the classic chunky rods and connectors that K'nex first came out with in 1992. They are recommended for age 7+, but with a bit of adult guidance I think even a 5 year old could build it.
Pynchon's rockets rising on
Two young men who are close friends fall for the same extraordinary girl, played by the wonderful Jeanne Moreau. The character she plays is unpredictable, exciting, and dangerous. Irresistible. The film is often light-filled and joyous but the underlying tension between the characters introduces a dark foreshadowing, a tenebrous note of foreboding, a feeling that this will not turn out well. As I was watching, I remember thinking: ‘You could update this. Make it now.’
Young hearts hopefully rebuild.
Funny how back in 2008, the high gas prices were threatening to destroy our country and ruin our economy, yet today, are a blessing--and even saving lives!
The foam came cut the right length by the fabulous Joann employees, however, it was a bit too wide for the bench. To cut the foam, we started by placing the MDF board on top of the foam and marking the exact size with a black Sharpie marker:
1- Sift the flour with the baking powder.
What crime novel would you most like to have written?
Here’s the video:
Oil for deep fry.
RON: “The Yellow Dog” is about a mangy old dog who is totally devoted to his frontier family and will do anything to protect them from marauding indians.
“Silent Night”
We have so much to do and so little time to do it in, just read a friends blog and the questions he and a friend of his were asking, http://keepitsimplesurvival.wordpress.com/2012/04/15/how-much-longer/
I admire its honesty,
3. Victory. This one needs the most work: as you can see it's too thich and the curls aren't quite as tight and sausage-y as they should be. I'll be sending them a few more pics to see if the more traditional victory roll can be achieved: if not then the idea will sadlyb have to be scrapped!
Sarcastic
By the glistening waters
Cake The distance
Color Me Impressed
As whatever category of sport judge you try to treat the miscroscopic insults still , when it all continues or simply escalates it is important to undergo process to run managers, motorcoaches, and competitors.
The cast of all casts
The reason I am posting this blog is because I kind of feel like it is my first time competing again. I am not really sure where to begin. Mainly because my training has to start from ground zero, so it feels like everything else is starting from the beginning as well. So I wanted to write this blog in honour of all the folks out there who are planning to make 2012 the year of their competition debut.
So, back to what kind of cake. Bryce immediately answered that he wanted a Kubota tractor cake. Hmmm, that's a tough one! So, I let it go. Then about a week before his birthday I asked him again what cake he wanted - hoping he had forgotten what he 'ordered' the last time. No such luck. In a very 'I told you this before' tone of voice he said, "I want a Kubota tractor cake!" Well, no getting out of it for me. I tossed a couple of ideas around but nothing seemed right. So, I procrastinated. Until Saturday when I decided I could procrastinate no longer. I half-heartedly looked online for ideas when suddenly, this website stood out to me. Frozen Buttercream Transfer - I had never heard of it. Intrigued, I read the entire thing, then decided I could do this. I happened to have a photo of DH's Kubota tractor on the computer so I blew it up and printed it off.
if you're going to be in a locked down situation, having good food to eat is a necessity. not to sound too tragic (i've told y'all about southern gothic living already) but, we are watching the slow degeneration of a once lovely woman and i am no longer her favorite. i accept that it isn't personal, it's the disease talking, so i can deal with it. sort of.... so, change is underway. everyone understands what must happen, but it doesn't make the immediate any easier. we cook, share a glass of wine and for a few moments it's all ok.
Of the Fifth Battalion
Then afterward, we went downstairs where I had a lovely dinner prepared. Don't EVEN ask what it was. OK, I'll tell you. Stouffer's Chicken Enchilladas.
Researchers have shown that although leaving a baby to cry it out does often lead to the cries eventually stopping, the cries do not stop because the child is content or the problem has been alleviated. Rather, they stop because the baby has given up hope that a caregiver will respond and provide comfort. This results in a detached baby. Detached children are less responsive, appear to be depressed or "not there" and
That's what camp is all about... pushing yourself, and doing better a little bit each time. It's a great feeling, and it's why I keep coming back. Even after being away for well over a year, it feels like... home. I always make a friend or two, and even though I'm always glad when we are cooling down, the workout really is fun. Challenging, but fun. It makes me feel like I've accomplished something great when I get in my car and drive home for that post-workout cold shower.
-Try to link a post that you think fits into the mission. You don’t have to link up every week,link up when you can. We welcome posts that are shared in other events. If you have an older, archived post that you want to add, we welcome that…as long as you go in and add a link back to Hearth and Soul.
All these little details may be something only we really noticed, but it was these little things that helped pull our day together. Each thing was fun to do and we worked on it together.
Hines’ arrest report said an argument between the groups involved the younger golfers driving, drinking and “malingering” on the greens.
I want to thank Walden Media for providing a review copy of Breadcrumbs!
JT65-HF however would not receive anything when using this card. It's inbuilt automatic sample rate correction very quickly settled on a correction factor of around 0.3 for RX and 1.00 for TX, but never produced a decoded signal despite the same on-air signals decoding perfectly well in MultiPSK and WSJT9.
Topics were:
But my Sunrise. My hope fulfilled. My beginning. Over and over and over again.
The terrors of the night repeat. The taps on the window pane become louder, the shadows more menacing, the whistle of wind from the casement gaps providing an eerie symphony to the dancing choir upon the wall. Jas wide-eyed as tentacles crawl across the ceiling. She imagines bony phalanges pulling at her hair,
Winged ants have two long wings 5 to 8 millimeters (1.9 to 3.1 in) in length. They build their nests close to sources of food and water. These ants have remained unchanged for millions of years.
Here’s the before and after pictures!
The “Gemma Arterton” Heaven.
Now we have accomplished hard labor to offer you with terrific information and facts on Casio Men’s PAG240B-2CR Pathfinder Triple Sensor Multi-Function Sport Watch, so come to feel zero cost to seem close to our site.
If Gilead gives an image of an ideal, if unrealized, father, Home wrestles with the reality of trying to understand a son who does not know how to be one. Robert Boughton, Ames' best friend and neighbor, is also nearing the end of his life, and his son has come back to see him one last time. Has he come back for forgiveness or for a reckoning? Can the elder Boughton make peace? Does he even want to? Home is fascinating study in what it means to be the son your father didn't want, even as he adores you.
Rob Jo Star Band, S/T, PommeAlmost perfect quality re-press of this French contribution to 70s garage/psych/rock/experimentation.
But now this woman is accepting beer from this man and has refused to allow me to buy her even a glass of wine! I feel offended, but I hide it. A few moments later, her girlfriend pulls her man away to the dance floor. So we are left alone again to chat.
In February, Brick 26 launched Project 26 in Long Island Schools, with children each contributing 26 cents. The event resulted in the collection of more than $3,400.
3) Arizona Diamondbacks (13-11) J. Saunders (2-1, 0.90) @ Washington Nationals (14-9) E. Jackson (1-1, 3.16), 6:05 pm
Another rondeau I particularly enjoy is also often cited as a great example of the form, titled "We Wear the Mask", by Paul Laurence Dunbar, a truly amazing poet of the late 19th century, and the first African-American to gain notoriety as a poet.
I always admired Thor. He could kick ass, but he was basically a decent guy. He didn’t laugh much, didn’t know many jokes, but he helped people, and with his elaborate costume and sculpted hair he appeared like an upright fashion model or fierce clown. He charged into battle. He wasn’t a thinker.
And filling the middle of the table: all the various seed bead tubes and findings, etc that I need to work on the fringe necklace. Except for that pile of black seed beads to the left of my Thread Heaven - those are for the cubic right angle weave bracelet, but I moved them over closer to the DVD player, so I could reach them more easily while I was beading (while watching movies, of course).
I finally went to the doctor after the heart attack scare at the inter bash and this is what I found out.... I had pneumonia for the whole month of March. My heart was working harder because of the water in my lungs so my blood pressure was elevated. High blood pressure makes the bottom of your feet burn. Because I don't have a thyroid Dr Jones can't give me antibiotics. After a course of sulfa drugs we thought it best to do more tests just to make sure.
How can you tell? The Son is not manifested in their mortal flesh. Specifically, they do their own will (do not recognize authority), and they have no love for the brethren. Two things that characterized Christ were His refusal to do His own will. He submitted to God without debate or complaint. And oh, how He loves us.
In other words, the Student Union should be allowed to inflict its nonsensical leftist agenda on all students, whilst claiming to speak for those who join simply for the discounts and social life.
Looking at Jesus at the age of twelve, I am reminded of something my friend, David Mills, once wrote in a large email discussion, commenting on the efforts by some writer named Ann Rice to create a biographical sketch of Jesus. About her efforts he wrote; "There is one Person whom we must not try to understand in terms of psychology,"-or words to that effect. How true. We are not in a position to analyze Jesus Christ, or to guess at motivation for his words and actions.
Without teeth or even the ability to stand or do anything by myself, mum took great care of me. Thanks to Mum and God. Many were born on the same day, month, or the same year but their parents dumped them while others passed away on that day. Not forgetting to mention that some did not even mature up to be born since their mothers aborted them. That definitely makes me love my mum. God bless her in abundance. Just as I was, she accepted me, in her laps I sat on not forgetting the good milk from her breast that has made me strong and energetic fit to survive.
26lb to the victorious Hold On Julio. He warmed up for the John Smith’s Grand National with another second, this time going down by a neck to Giles Cross in a thrilling finish to the Grade Three Betfred Grand National Trial at Haydock on February 18.
They don't.
The only precision rifle I've got ready at the moment is my long range AR, and that tops out at 600 in no wind (a 75gr bullet just doesn't have the mass to resist major crosswinds)... There's never no wind at boomershoot. I'd pretty much be limited to 400 yards; and our spot is on the long range side of the firing line.
Add: Cyborgs and androids and plagues: Oh, my!
Second, a sample of confessional material from the 50′s and 60′s CE, as collected from Paul. (For the complete list of Paul’s — and others’ — citations, see part 3 of this series.)
So maybe it's time to take stock and ask myself what I've learned, where I've failed and what I've managed to achieve, as well as trying to decide my aims for the next five 5 years or so.
Some of these girls do marry well--surprisingly so! But they are amongst the few. As for the rest, they make their own lives and their husband's a burden to them. Without having time given them to mature their ideas, these latter are hurried into matrimony while still children, without having formed a conception of the terrible responsibility that attaches itself to every human soul who agrees to join itself to another.
While there is some debate about the best Star Wars film uninamously all fans agree that Return of the Jedi was the most disapointing. Was it the ewoks? Possibly, but I will argue that its the only film of the original trilogy that doesnt have Han Solo on the Falcon.
The great thing about Bottled in Bond whiskeys is not only that they are 100 proof (though that is also good), but they take a lot of the guess work out of dusty hunting since they are required to provide the Distilled Spirits Plant (DSP) number where the spirit was distilled and bottled.
JT - So there could be further penalties then?
Juggling a few things - trying something new - transitioning! I never do well with transitioning - the time change every spring and fall is a good indication of my inability to transition well! So is this time of the year when I move from strictly indoor training to outside running. Some days are perfect - lace up the shoes and off I go - other days are not so good and I have to push myself to climb back aboard the treadmill. Looking back on various running journals, this time of year always shows sporadic training. Always!
After finishing our antique secretary (which I'll post about later), I had leftover Old White and decided to use it to redo a few items to add to my inventory.
And for something completely different, my Patriots are playing in the Super Bowl for the fifth time in the past decade. This is a repeat of the matchup four years ago when the Patriots had a chance to be the first 19-0 team ever but were upset by the Giants. I hope the Patsies get revenge, but I have this odd feeling that they won't. I keep reading about how Patriot running back Green-Ellis has never once fumbled in his five years in the NFL, so I can't help but feel that this is the perfect setup -- my Patriots losing due to his first fumble.
An insurgent is not someone who resists terrorists, and tries to defend themselves, their own livelihoods and that of their children, their own property and means of subsistence, and their own homeland!
It was a devoted Puritan household.
We look forward to seeing you there and thanks for all you do!
The dubiously-monikered moggy - inherited from an unreconstructed Watford fan who had named him after his favourite club striker from the 80s - had been a lovely pet. He was a very patient animal, more akin to a dog than a cat. If you called his name, he’d rouse himself from wherever he was sleeping in the house, and report promptly and dutifully to your lap for a cuddle.
This little packet has 3 books for emergent readers.
Prediction? It all depends on what version of Liverpool turn up and Norwich will want to atone for their last performance at home which saw them ship six goals to Manchester City. A 2-2 daw.
There, that's off my chest - should I mention the issue of 'cheaper prices'. No, leave it alone - you don't want to look like an all-round obsessive. Or is it too late already?
This is what I signed up for and I am so very capable of doing this.
It begins with love, it ends with love and it is carried out with passion and an unstoppable heart.
With final exams approaching, Saint Peter’s College students are starting to feel overwhelmed and anxious. Stress is inevitable this time of the year, according to Barbara Melchione, director of the Center of Advancement in Language and Learning (CALL center) and professor at SPC.
After the mistake, they emailed the 894 applicants telling them they were not admitted. In fairness to UCLA, this has happened at UCSD and UCSB, but we don’t play them in football.
Please try it and email us the results!
And for those of you that don't hate today, Happy Valentine's Day!
Woman is God’s supreme creation. Only after the earth had been formed, after the day had been separated from the night, after the waters had been divided from the land, after vegetation and animal life had been created, and after man had been placed on the earth, was woman created; and only then was the work pronounced complete and good. Of all the creations of the Almighty, there is none more beautiful, none more inspiring than a lovely daughter of God who walks in virtue with an understanding of why she should do so. (Gordon B. Hinckley)
Petitioners contend that the complaint clearly and unmistakably states a cause of action as it contains sufficient allegations concerning their right to a sound environment based on Articles 19, 20 and 21 of the Civil Code (Human Relations), Section 4 of Executive Order (E.O.) No. 192 creating the DENR, Section 3 of Presidential Decree (P.D.) No. 1151 (Philippine Environmental Policy), Section 16, Article II of the 1987 Constitution recognizing the right of the people to a balanced and healthful ecology, the concept of generational genocide in Criminal Law and the concept of man’s inalienable right to self-preservation and self-perpetuation embodied in natural law. Petitioners likewise rely on the respondent’s correlative obligation per Section 4 of E.O. No. 192, to safeguard the people’s right to a healthful environment.
Australian Emma van Leest is one of my favorite paper cut artists. In general, I have a soft spot in my heart for anyone that can create something so delicately beautiful out of a sheet of paper, but Emma’s work goes a step beyond the average paper cutter. Inspired by her travels and studies in the East, specifically China, Indonesia, and India, as well as her interests in Medieval saints, fairy tales, and folk art, Emma creates a unique and fascinating world that is simply awe inspiring. Her work is so breathtaking in its intricacies and subject matter that it’s nearly impossible to resist. I can’t even imagine the work that goes into one of her pieces!
Recently, Jack LaLanne passed away. His TV show was off the air before I even started watching tv but his inventions and gyms are what made him the godfather of fitness in my eyes.
Les glasses on or Les glasses off, do you reckon?
1432 D-VI/15/2002. “Gus Matzorkis (1929-2001) and the Immortality of the Soul.” Seminar, Cobb Hall, Basic Program of Liberal Education for Adults, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
“First and foremost, I can never understand why people feel like they have to resort to calling the police, especially when no crime has been committed. If religious people are unhappy with secular event organisers, they should sort it out among themselves privately like adults.”
elusive source.
Ah yes, we know who has the money to do that. And maybe we know what he’ll expect in return. Dollars and Sense now detours down the road of Indecent Proposal (1993), made more interesting by Louis’ increasingly nuanced performance. I love the way Stanhope faces Hazel in the bakery, informing her of her upcoming appointment in his hotel room—he takes the time to place his gloves in his upturned, fancy hat, then places the hat on David’s countertop, all the while fixating on Hazel. It is a precisely choreographed gesture; one we suspect he would not have performed if David were present. Scenes like these enflesh a character that, on paper, must have been bone-thin. When Stanhope’s motives eventually prove to be more complex than advertised, we are suitably prepared.
through irrigation and
‘uh, dad? you okay?’
overseas for a year. The week
"We're still waiting for ... "
Our boiler broke recently, at what felt like the coldest few days we’ve had so far this winter. We had no heating or hot water. It was probably warmer outside than in so we went to meet Keryn and other friends at the beach, we ended up staying with them that night so we could have a hot bath and be warm. I wasn’t prepared for it, I had no nappies or clothes for you. I’ve been wanting to get you out of nappies at night for a while now, but because we’ve been working on you sleeping independently I didn’t feel it was right … to have too many expectations.
We haven't been able to post on blogs correctly for MONTHS - and not at all for quite some time - as you can see :)
This post is a study in sorrow, an ill-fated, misbegotten letter of woe that even now causes me to cry at the sight of it.
black Rose-heart holes until you
But Deutsche Post DHL said that any surplus for that subsidiary would be transferred to help offset shortfalls in other aviation units operating in its express delivery business in Europe. Over all, it said, its emissions would match the number of permits it had acquired.
Czech Republic President Vaclav Klaus, who has personal experience with living under Socialism, warns that it may not be as dead as many seem to think: “We can probably confidently say that its “hard version” – communism – is over.” However, “fifteen years after the collapse of communism I am afraid, more than at the beginning of its softer (or weaker) version, of social-democratism, which has become – under different names, e.g. the welfare state – the dominant model of the economic and social system of current Western civilization. It is based on big and patronizing government, on extensive regulating of human behavior, and on large-scale income redistribution.” “The explicit socialism has lost its appeal and we should not have it as the main rival to our ideas today.” Klaus warns that illiberal ideas are making a comeback in different shapes: “These ideas are, however, in many respects similar to it. There is always a limiting (or constraining) of human freedom, there is always ambitious social engineering, there is always an immodest “enforcement of a good” by those who are anointed (Thomas Sowell) on others against their will.” “The current threats to liberty may use different ‘hats’, they may better hide their real nature, they may be more sophisticated than before, but they are – in principle – the same as always.”
I really liked how this book discussed the Bronte sisters’ keen interest in women’s rights and how they incorporated this into their novels. All three sisters wrote about strong heroines that did not bend to the will of men and searched for meaning in their lives. I find it very interesting.
I bold words and ideas I consider important, and doing so can drastically change the meaning of words and sentences. This is a trick I learned from reading comic books. Observe the following. What is the difference when I say, “You don’t have to” from, “You don’t have to”? The former statement can be taken as is, but the latter raises further questions. Have? Or need? Or want? That emphasis also adds some color to the sentence.
thumbs up. friday lunch run. ouch. 1st mile painful. discard orthotics. pain relieved.
1. Zach Mettenberger (6/10, 60% comp., 150yds, 2 TD’s) – Ironically, the guy who will sit out the first game of the season was the one who looked the best in the scrimmage this afternoon. Mettenberger had it all going for him; accuracy on short and deep passes, velocity, pocket presence, even some mobility thrown in for good measure. I was stunned at just how much he seems to have progressed from when we last saw him in the G-day game of 2009. He looked crisp and confident. I pointed out to a buddy that he looked very Stafford-esque. The arm-strength that everyone has said he has is definitely not overrated, as is evidenced by the fact that he picked up 150 yards in the air on just 6 completions). What may win him more points with the coaching staff than anything was how at ease he looked. He never looked hurried or hesitant. And to be fair, he did play against the 2nd team defense, while the other two QB’s played against the 1st team D, but Mettenberger also was playing behind the 2nd team O-line and the rest of the 2nd team offense the entire time. It didn’t seem to phase him, as he made a great case for himself. The question is: will Richt see fit to make Mettenberger the starter, given that he will not be able to play in the opener against Louisiana-Lafayette? South Cackalacky is a tough game to get your first start in… but if he’s the best at the position, can you NOT start him?
The inspirational image was this bedroom of Axel Vervoordt.
The acting was nice, but since all adult characters were written over the top, especially Count Olaf, I did not find any of them enjoyable. I feel Carrey did the best he could with the role of Count Olaf, but it appears to be such a difficult role, I don’t know if anybody could have pulled it off. I would liked to have seen Robin Williams in the part. The two child actors, Emily Browning and Liam Aiken (Road to Perdition), who played the middle child Klaus, were quite enjoyable.
In October last year, 19 Special Forces officers and men were killed in a firefight with Abu Sayyaf and Moro Islamic Liberation Front members in Basilan.
Every night is a fight
"So, this week's challenge is to create your own pinwheel for peace."
just one
By their actions you shall know them, whether bad or good, whether on another side or ours.
It was a support group of sorts for all those folks who regard themselves as talented because they have a dot com address and can press “publish” but not a single reason to feel they have talent. Kristin Wiig was a “photo blogger.” Ouch. O, my.
-1 clove
Thanks Jun and David for accepting my gift of desserts. (Seriously, what were you thinking entrusting me with such an important part of your day?!) Thank you for including me in your special day, and I send you a dessert bar full of good wishes for many more happy years together!
Oh my love for you
The Gentry live show was by all accounts more of a rocking affair than her records let on, and the 1969 album Touch 'Em With Love certainly shifted up a gear. The polished brass of the title track failed to chart as a single, but a version of Bacharach and David's I'll Never Fall In Love Again - with Bobbie's voice straining in an endearingly high register - charted all over Europe, making it all the way to number one in Britain. This was followed by the Top 3 All I Have To Do Is Dream, another Everlys-originated duet with Glen Campbell. Back home, Bobbie got hitched to casino magnate William F. Harrah - she was 25 and he was 58. It lasted three months. According to Mojo magazine Harrah, who was none too impressed with his young wife heading out on tour, followed her to a theatre and caught her in flagrante backstage. Maybe he should have listened to Courtyard before he signed the wedding contract*.
So here is a little look at the bathroom.
Want to Sell Your Books at the Conference?
Beyond my excitement, I am experiencing a tiny inner tug of satisfaction and peace. I feel good about this. I know I am making something available that will be really meaningful for the children involved. I know that parents will have a chance to bring their children to a group where they are wanted. That is all I ever wanted or my own son.
Sarah Palin isn't presidential material. I can easily say that despite the fact that I don't disagree with everything she spouts off about. She's very fond of telling us what is wrong in America, and there are things wrong in America today. Hell, that's easy to say. What I've never heard her utter is solutions to fixing what is wrong in America though. She's all rhetoric and sound bite.
28Then Joshua let the people go away, every man to his heritage.
The interview includes Ezer’s commentary on specific pages in the New American Haggadah.
Strangely, while the whales were drawn to Cape Cod months earlier than usual this year, Calanus has been less abundant than in years past. But other plankton have thrived in the warmer conditions.
Rushing to work to make others rich
It is 4 something in the morning and it is obvious that I cannot sleep. So guess what I decided to do? Yup! You guessed it. I decided to create a blog that I am actually going to make a serious attempt to keep current. Unlike the one that I started in November. I will save that story for another day.
fall, be crushed and ground and chewed
When it comes to football, like many supporters I’m two fans rolled into one.
Given the shots we’re given throughout of chaos in the streets (not to mention the blowing up of bridges and a football field), it appears that the people of Gotham and Bane’s forces are going to at their very ends here.
Temps: 149:17
Finally, why does this mom feel like she has to babysit this boy? She should send both boys outside and give herself a break! Instead of obsessing unnecessarily about their safety, why not bask in a little sanity while the kids enjoy a walk around the block together?
Cotton is durable, soft and machine washable. Everyone loves snuggling up to clean, fresh cotton. With cotton slip covers in a variety of elegant covers, you can keep your home looking and feeling great while protecting valuable furniture from pet hair and dirt. Allow your dogs and cats to play of the furniture as much as you or they wish, then, just throw this durable cover in the wash with your regular load of laundry. Tumble dry, and you're all set. Cotton is a famously affordable fabric, so you can stock up on tons of gorgeous colors. Change the look of a room in one move with great looking, functional slip covers in Sage, Chocolate, Taupe, Bluestone and more.
if i'd have known they were going to be as cute as they were...
The world has advice for those aging: lose weight, change the diet, increase activity, color the grays, moisturize the wrinkles, and for heaven's sake, get into a Zumba class. If a part fails you, replace it with titanium, and for the love of Pete, take your pills. In the same breath we are reminded to plan our funerals lest our loved ones be burdened with the task of interning us six feet under. We are encouraged to make all the arrangements, and for all practical purposes, stand next to the hole for the final years so when we do keel over we fall right in. Perhaps we should change the Corporal Works of Mercy by removing "bury the dead" and adding "bury yourself so the living don't have to be bothered".
So often we don’t utilize one of the most persuasive selling components in our marketing materials – the words of our own clients. Many creative people have wonderful testimonials from clients, but never use them for fear that they are “bragging” or that it is “too self promotional.”
and I think she'll get a lot of use out of our Hilda.
The joint that kicked off the dessert bar trend in 2003, ChikaLicious is as good as watching a friend whip up magic in her kitchen while you get to prop yourself up at the counter with a glass of sherry or a cup of chamomile. As you sit back and relax, Chika prepares your meticulous treats in the open kitchen while her husband-partner-sommelier, Don, offers the perfect accompanying wine. Rounding out the chez-amis vibe are homey details like mismatched china, jazz music, and lots of small talk and genuine smiles.
I was clearly not looking too bright because she pressed a cool palm against my forehead and frowned.
Exercise is wonderful. I love so many forms of exercise: swimming, biking, kickboxing, Pilates, power walks, light weights, etc.
Like a whore — and tomorrow.
The Federals opened fire on the city, filled with women and children. This bombardment lasted for several day, but caused little damage. Col Autry was killed in battle on Dec 31 1862 and his body was returned to his home in Holly Springs
Mom: Derek. Our son is not a loser. But the other kids are making fun of him online and—
In proximity with the planned meetings between Iran and the IAEA and with the P5+1, one can wonder what is an honest and objective contribute for these opportunities to become effective, and leading to a positive outcome.
Google Plus Followers: 580
“We owe a great deal of thanks to these individuals,” says Matthews. “They paid attention to their instincts and reacted quickly, allowing us to protect this gentleman from fraud.”
1. When I was a little girl, I looked just like my mother when she was my age. Seriously. She showed me a picture once of her at my age and I thought it was a picture of me. Now that I've grown, I favor my father more in the looks department, although I'm still often told that I'm the perfect combination of my parents, both in looks and personality.
That makes him a real WINNER in what matters most.
The shade I am talking about is 6 Bubblegum. So, so pretty it’s a real Barbie pink. The packaging is nothing to shout about but it is the little gem inside that has been adorning my lips these past few weeks (you may have seen me Tweeting about it!) I don’t even think photos do this shade justice. It is amazing!
-Brush the edges of the wrapper lightly with egg.
Junax like to fuck on the beach as the moon waxed to it's fullest extent. David Dodds liked to shop for beige pyjamas that he could sew his name on along with Royal Irish Rifles insignia. How could Junax hope to compete with that? A D.I.Y lobotomy possibly, but no other way no how. That was the kind of shit that made hair stylists crazy. Apparently.
We ended up having to not wait for the valet to get our car, we ran down to it. The church benefit went till 9 pm, and then they charged you a dollar per minute you were late to pick up the kids. We ended up paying $12 extra. So much for getting the kids in bed by 8. I might just hang that idea up all together and buck up and just live my life scheduless. This is just flipping impossible.
The old wound, if stricken, is the sorest---
I did run in a 2 mile race on Saturday morning benefitting the local Catholic school----small race of about 90 people. I came in 11th and was the second female to finish so I was very pleased---18:56. thankfully it was at 7 AM so it wasn't too hot, but I was still sweating---very humid!
Using a stick blender, puree soup until evenly consistent in texture.
The hollowness never gets filled. It’s an abysmal pit of desires.
1. Applicant must be willing to create 6 projects per month with digital
It will be amazing to have this piece to use in my workouts. There are so many different things you can do with this and my goal is to just really be able to rock out some reverse pull ups with this thing. The cost of this station deflates my excitement a little because it's $129 bucks! That's a little too much for this cheap skate sitting here, but if I could find it on sale and then dig up an online coupon some where, well then folks I might just be willing to splurge a little. However, my solution is even better and probably a lot cheaper too! The good ol' handsome (and handy!!) hubby is going to build me one for Mother's Day (per my request of course!). He found some plans online and will be putting those little babies in motion soon! I am uber excited for this.
The Light Consciousness came from Traz Function Farm-Nest
Zeus sculpted her in clay
and then, at long last,
1. There are a lot of cool and engaging folks in Ottawa: And most of them are into health and fitness from what we could gather from our gathering. It’s nice to see a
Brewed: 03-05-2008
As a forward, I wrote this because we played Jabberwocky. It’s a fun board game, and I was tempted to write timed short stories! This idea came to mind after playing too much Dawn of War: Black Crusade.
Update from YG:
best mom
In terms of homebrewing, you can brew a gluten-free beer but it becomes a lot more difficult. A number of interesting recipes can be found at http://www.fortunecity.com/boozers/brewerytap/555/gfbeer/recipes.htm and a fairly detailed article on the various techniques involved can be found at the Brew Your Own site, "Gluten-Free Brewing" http://byo.com/feature/1589.html. (By the way, I subscribe to Brew Your Own magazine and can recommend it.) Judging by that article, it looks as if extract brewing is the way to go--only the most intrepid homebrewer would brew from all grain, since at this point that involves malting your own sorghum (or other non-glutenous grain) and then conducting a very technically challenging triple decoction mash to convert the starches in that grain to fermentable sugars.
I decided to start having this weekly feature of things I love. They could be purchasable things, inanimate things, photos, a kind word, etc.
Carol leaves fresh poems
Oh, God of our country! Oh, our country's God!
12 ounces good-quality white chocolate, chopped (I used almond bark)
1PM ROSALIND CREASY EDIBLE GARDENS: WHAT MOST GARDENERS WANT TO KNOW
Or is it…
So for the next few days ill be lounging, cocktailing, sunning, beaching, dancing, eating, laughing….and doing whatever other ings I can think of. Time for me to throw my hair in a top knot, cloak myself in a bikini and kaftan and see you lovelies in a week!
One is self awareness. How close to yourself are you? Are you your own best friend? Or is the person in the mirror a stranger? Can you be alone at a restaurant or a movie? These are clues to your emotional development and will determine how well you will recognize and handle your growth, the “changes” as they occur in your emotional body and as they move into and manifest into consciousness. Becoming a behavior pattern to recognize, heal, and once and for all release.
Justin: Very nice. So how did the two of you start your wedding chapel in Las Vegas?
The lady did say the next day. So I guess i took it a bit too much to heart.
July 15th, 1912 saw the release of the Vitagraph short entitled Conscience (alternate title: The Chamber of Horrors). The movie follows a woman in financially dire straits who steals a bottle of milk to feed her hungry child. She hides from the police in a wax museum's Chamber of Horrors exhibit, unknowing that her estranged husband has also decided to take refuge there, and her presence causes him to drop dead with fright. While the premise may not seem terribly horrifying, this is an early example of a wax museum setting that would become a bit of a staple for the genre.
when they return into the now-empty room,
Speaker-independent name dialling (SIND)
We’re not going — and I think you have to be realistic in your indignation. I want to control the border. I want English to be the official language of government. I want us to have a lot of changes.
"I've been working my arse off in the police for 19 years and now I have to apologise to her for doing my job," said Odendaal.
I hear, however, that it will be replace by a South Asian market and food court. Which does not sound bad. And seems right for the area.
120bpm and trance bug-outs aren't what spring to mind the first time you see Iceland's beautifully peaceful scenery. But with lyrics rooted in their countryside ("Drive me into the highlands / Throw me into the soft moss") Gus Gus hope to change your mind.
the guy she really should love ...
We’ve been married for 15 years so he can say that. I sure hope he can say that, because that’s what I say when we pull into the parking lot of an electronics store and I announce I’m waiting in the car.
We went through the history of growing grapes and making wines, different types of grapes (varietals), wine laws in different countries, old world vs new world wines, differences between whites, reds, roses, dessert wines, and sparkling wines, the flavors, aromas, and textures in wine, and how to make wines taste and smell the way you want them to.
Quote: “That team sure did suck last night. They just plain sucked! I’ve seen teams suck before, but they were the suckiest bunch of sucks that ever sucked.”
· They use the term “Touch not God’s anointed” frequently when questions are raised.
PLASTIC BAGS POLLUTE!
I would have Frankenstein’s Monster. I’ve always felt he got a raw deal and I’d like to make things up to him as long as he doesn’t leak formaldehyde all over his plate.
I am an award winning private futures trader.
See you later, guys.
"Um, no, no piercings or anything," I told her, while my face turned super red. "Are you wearing any panties that may have metal on them?" "Are you really asking me about my panties right now?"
I have no clue what color they will be, but that doesn't matter to me, it's the smell I'm after. I love the heady fragrance of hyacinths, just like lily of the valley or the scent of lilacs, that smell tells me spring has arrived.
The 9/11 AUMF authorizes force only against persons and groups who have a connection to the September 11 terrorist attacks. The 9/11 AUMF says nothing about detention, let alone the indefinite detention of American citizens.
Imogene laughed. Almost.
I'm about to attempt to teach True Grit, so some blog posts concerning my evolving thoughts on both the Charles Portis novel and the Coen brothers' movie version seem in order. While I very much admire the novel, the more recent and highly respectful 2010 movie version does take some odd liberties with the storyline. (Why does LaBoeuf have to bite his tongue?) Some opening notes:
I personally feel somewhat uncomfortable with opposing this park. It sounds like a good idea in many ways. However, I had to remind myself of a couple truths I’ve found over the years. 1. It will not work out like they say 2. It will be much bigger than they claim. 3. It will be painful in the long run.
Everything I've got in this Life I owe directly to my father's influence. He taught me that "God loves a tryer" - no truer words - that if I worked hard and tried, I might fail and fall flat on my face - and I have a couple times - but that if I picked myself up each and every time and kept on trying, in the end I'd always make it. My father's words got me through my darkest hours, the hardest times in Special Forces, and they inspire me to this day.
Until then, I am working on the style section of my book today. I discovered that I have an untidy writing style. I have structured the book into sections, and then subsections, and I am completing each one in the order that appeals to me on that day. This keeps it really fresh for me. I am constantly thinking of things to put in sections other than what I am working on, so I can add those thoughts to the relevant section, ready for the day that I choose to write that bit. Slightly haphazard – I think that says a lot about how I do things. You may have come to this conclusion yourself by reading this blog. At least I can say that the tasks I complete are done passionately and with lots of enthusiasm, and if it does not seem methodical at the time, the end result is usually just fine.
At least in WHSmith. I heard this item on Woman's Hour this morning:
Last winter I sat happily working one afternoon during a heavy snow fall and it was so quiet and so beautiful, exactly like being inside one of those glass snow globes.
Ok, Hope to see you back soon. Have a great day. I intend to as it is back to work tomorrow!!!!
After deciding to be a higher-maintenance bride than I had theretofore intended, I further decided that on March 1st (St. David’s Day, as any self-respecting Welsh person or otherwise follower of my blogs past and present would know), I would take a personal day. It might be quite nice to take a personal day for St. David’s Day, but I had other tasks at hand.
Guarding.
The Complete Works of Charles Dickens was one of my first purchases on my Kindle, along with Shakespeare and Jane Austen. With so many ways to read him, in and out of the house, there will be no excuse not to make 2012 the year of the Big Re-read. I can't wait!
His work in New Hampshire has attracted a great deal of attention; 8W, 4L, 2.86 ERA, 88IP, 81H, 7HR. While in Lansing it was noted that he allowed 1 homerun in 124 IP. Toronto fans must cheer this kid on, as he is one of a few young starters in a Jay’s rotation that is looking very solid so far.
Meanwhile Raven and Thorkel the Black, Gunnlaug’s kinsman, fought until Thorkel fell before Raven and lost his life; and so at last all their fellowship fell. Then they two alone fought together with fierce onsets and mighty strokes, which they dealt each the other, falling on furiously without stop or stay.
Only memories are left like this
Remember the big hat I told you about? The yule gift for biggest girl?
But no, I am behind the times, it seems. For some reason, in recent times the Guardian (possibly the leading serious daily newspaper in Britain) has become a home for lovers of ‘music of black origin’ who write about music. That’s another story, but the relevance: this article (click here).
Be well Beautiful people!
I've hit a wall, though. I've encountered several books I would love to read, but they are only in e-book format. I'm considering asking for a reader for my birthday, but I have heard bad things about Kindle, and I've been told it matters a LOT what reader I choose to get. I want one that will pretty much read anything--I don't want to find out after I've bought the stupid thing that it only reads SOME books--and I want one that is easy to manipulate and read. Can I read it in the sunshine? Do I have to be in a darkened room? How heavy is it?
THIS IS ALL PART OF THE REAL WW1 WHICH MOHAMED STARTED AFTER HIS GENOCIDAL CAMPAIGN IN ARABIA WAS OVER AND HIS MARTIAL IDEOLOGY SPREAD VIA TERROR EAST THROUGH NORTH AFRICA AND INTO EUROPE VIA SPAIN, AND WEST TO PERSIA AND INDIA AND SE ASIA.
Anyway, I’ve been watching TV and I just made some Mac ‘n Cheese. Them I’m going to do the dishes, because they’re all dirty, and it would make my parents happy.
The same for public servants. Police officers require the use of sight in making reports besides assessing the threat to the public and their own safety. Paramedics make reports with vital statistics of a patient from many different senses at the same time. Firemen and women are trained to take verbal queues before getting to the scene of an emergency to take their own assessment of the situation.
I have been teaching "If I Listen With My Heart" with sign language. I'm not doing it as detailed as last year, but it's still a lot of work for the kids. There are some new teachers and kids in the primary and so it seemed like the perfect opportunity to use one of my favorite activities - snipping ties off of unsuspecting men in the ward. I asked the missionaries a few days prior if they would please wear ties I provided and then use them in the activity. I get old ties, or pick them up at the thrift store. (These came from D.I., my favorite place). I pulled them out of my bag and my husband asked where I had gotten these awful ties. The uglier the better.
The first thing I did when I got home Saturday night, was run the whirlpool tub full of hot water and jump in. BB said he thought I was dying in there as he listened to my achey breakey moans and groans. Wow, that was refreshing!
So fun getting the Christmas spirit going with all these family pictures recently!
We believe in His name
I feel so much better putting the right foods into my mouth.
Since starting our TMMO in February, we have paid off $9,630.22 worth of debt. Not that I'm keeping track or anything. LOL! That feels pretty amazing. Of course a bulk of that money came from our tax refund but just shy of $5,000 came from budgeting. Budgeting! Figure that! Amazing what happens when you know where every dollar is going! Plus we were able to save $500 to put towards an upcoming trip (yay!). And we have paid cash for every purchase made during the last three months. We are encouraged by our good start. If we can keep up our current pace, we will meet our goal for this year which would be beyond amazing. I am so, so, soooo thankful for finding Dave!
Twitter: It used to be fun but no more. It's become a mass of non-stop promotion and links. As a result, I'm spending much less time there and enjoying it even less. With nearly 2100 followers, I certainly don't want to abandon my Twitter account, but still....What's the point of it? I ask myself. Twitter time: Less.
Since some of you requested pictures of “the belly”, I thought I would humor you and share these that my mom took while they were visiting this past weekend.
A/N: I’m sorry for my mistake before *deep bow* so I repost this fict. I hope everyone still want to read it^^ Don’t forget to comment okay! well, this fict for a halloween but it’s too late ~~; Happy reading!
If you need ideas for your hampers or want a taste of France in your kitchen these holidays, here are some suggestions... (right click each time to open a new page and view the links )
To God who performs all things for me.
Following are excerpts from an Al-Jazeera TV program featuring, which aired on March 16, 2008:
midnight sun
And when at last I find you
How can you not think this is best for sound editing?
Which is why when I saw Daniel Kaluuya the funny geeky kid from The Fades (looking far less geeky) at the Astroid Boys gig in YoYo on Thursday I had to say hello. Turns out he was just about to ask for my photo as I was a dead ringer for his friend, Johnny Harris. The man who played Neil in The Fades AND Mick, the rapist in This Is England 86. Ah the irony, but I’m assured he’s a lovely bloke in real life.
from my finances, every form of sickness is destroyed and failure is completely
What if you would like to be more creative with your hostess gift and give something special, perhaps something you’ve made yourself? Here are a few ideas. For the recipe, just click the name.
ONE COMMENT PER ENTRY.
So–here we go, back to the main topic–so,yes, I’m ascribing some very human emotions to my backyard birds.
So there’s a pretty wide gap. Now, he’s more mature. He’s more conservative, I accept that. I think it’s a good thing. But those of us who were in the trenches fighting in the ’80′s, it would be nice to be recognized for what we actually did and not to have orchestrated attacks to try to distort the history of that period.
Mythos Breweries S.A. Aris Greek Lager
Eliot Wilder’s evaluation of Shadow’s career is based on several lengthy interviews he conducted by phone with the DJ savior himself. Covering everything from his middle class upbringing in Davis to his first encounter with Mo’ Wax’s James Lavelle to the critical adoration that greeted Endtroducing… practically from the moment of its release, this comprehensive recollection does a good job of filling in the blanks posed by that most mysterious of trip-hop virtuosos (Geoff Barrow notwithstanding).
If you have a Teenage girl then you have probably seen the Hunger games.... And if you have seen the Hunger Games you have also notice the false eyelashes that the female Actors wore. These are called Paperself Lashes and they are made from delicately cut out paper.
There is that sour beer, served in a tulip shaped glass by a French speaking Belgian whose family has been making beer like this one for hundreds of years. You stand with a group of mates in awe of the building, the heritage, the guys serving you the beer. You sniff and swirl and peer at the beers; tart, dusty, a hint of lemony citrus and a slight hint of an acetic twang.
Eat it fresh, or the next day. If you cover them with a towel, the sugar tops will stay crisp for awhile. If you store it tightly in a plastic bag, they'll still be delicious, but will get softer.
*idle* (which is not often, thankfully), he starts questioning EVERYTHING,
But the first was from an outfit called Ambit Energy, wanting me to make them my electricity supply company or ESCO. New York, you see, has mandated full retail competition in electricity, which means you get to decide which company supplies you with electricity. Well, the incumbent utility, ConEd, supplies you with it, keeps owning the wires that carry it into your house, bills you, and still owns a fair bit of generating capacity in the city.
Consumer acceptance of canola oil represents one in a series of victories for the food processing industry, which has as its goal the replacement of all traditional foods with imitation foods made out of products derived from corn, wheat, soybeans and oilseeds.
Officially, Poem in Your Pocket Day is April 26th, but that doesn’t mean you can only carry a poem that day. You can print poems from the internet and fold them into pocket-sized pieces, or you can buy a small poetry volume.
As together we would splash;
Yoochun: When I was in Grade 5, I received chocolates from all the girls in Grades 5 and 6. I was really proud of that. Whoa!!! I’m proud of you too!
The totally her mother's daughter part of Heather replies:
Instead, I cast my thoughts to cool, refreshing, summer salads. Perfect for a balmy March day. Crisp bites of cucumber are exactly what I would serve at my manicured lawn parties. The tang of vinegar would be matched only by the sharp tongue of my companions. And between our sips of lemonade we would marvel at how one little vegetable can transport one right out of their own life and into something far more fanciful.
The grunge reference comes up mostly because of the fact that Kim Gordon’s singing style reminds me so much of Courtney Love’s, and Hole is one of my favorite bands of the nineties, but that’s not to say Dirty is a grunge album – the vibe is very different, although I find it hard to explain. I guess it has to do with the background – Sonic Youth come from New York and draw a lot of strength from The Velvet Underground’s pioneering work, which is all very nice, but doesn’t overlap with grunge’s direct lineage. There’s a much more detached, “meta” feeling about this music, even though it’s every bit as massive and powerful as any of the Seattle scene’s outfits of the age.
In honor of National Scrapbook Day, we challenge you to a SCRAPLIFT challenge!!
Haven't kept in contact with many people from school. Not too sad about that.
These anti-gun folks just don't get it.
Do you guys ever feel that way?
Now I cannot write. Rather I draw letters and it takes a concentrated effort to do that. It also takes a concentrated effort during social interactions to carry on a conversation. No longer able to casually emphasize words with body language is constricting and distracting.
Mr4 likes the music loud when he is in the car. He likes the window down and the breeze in his hair. He tells me that he will be a much better driver than me. Apparently he will be 'fast' and will not hit the gutter when he attempts to reverse park. Everyone's a critic.
On Saturday night, a small group of music lovers gathered for a concert – in Andy Redhead’s living room. They enjoyed a stunning performance from 16-year-old Cairns guitarist Jordan Brodie, and they may well have been part of a historic first.
Now that we got the first week tailgate kinks worked out, I’m looking forward to getting to the Quad early and taking in the revelry. The atmosphere should be up there with LSU last year and Auburn the year before. The other thing I am really looking forward to is seeing, or rather hearing, how loud 101,000 plus can get. There was a great atmosphere last week, this week it should be unlike anything we’ve ever experienced.
I think I may have finally found a house! (Fingers crossed)
That’s being said, RTL support for LibreOffice still has problems, which I hope will be pushed during the 3.5.x cycles (full list at Bug 43808, the rtl meta bug). As to get some focus regarding was is to be done, I’m listing the top problems:
Not through Yanni music and lots of herbal tea.
Another example is the cognitive twitches... my brain isn't working the way I'm used to it working.
Stay with me while I connect the dots, OK?
Next stop: Target.
From Tanveer Naseer:
1/4 teaspoon freshly ground black pepper
But a few times per week, I run into a bona fide trout angler. And they want to know it all. "Ooh. That river. Which fork? Above the bridge? Where do you park? Are you talking the third pool or the fourth pool? What flies you throwin'? Where ya buy 'em?" And of course, I waver between telling them useless, ambiguous information aaaaaaaaaaaaand.....flat out lying and saying I was somewhere else. Heck no, I won't tell you where I keep catching fish! Not unless we fish there together!
In (well, not a) but a few words: It was. A. Game. Changer.
With nothing as it seems.
Did your book change covers today? I thought it was blue but maybe I made that up.
1/4tsp Garam masala powder
Wipz new material went down well with a funky track prod by Monsta Boy and a Grimey Dubstep track called Rockstar. English Frank raised the hype and then did a quick acapella about acting in a positive way.
And those who are still afraid,allow me to remind them that development won’t drop from the IMF- Merkel sky.
Laurenne Sala: A storyteller, comedian, and regular contributor to the Huffington Post, KCET, and her own blog, Humans are Funny. With a Master’s degree in Spiritual Psychology, Laurenne teaches writing therapy workshops that encourage the sharing of human truths. She produces and hosts Taboo Tales, a storytelling show with the same mantra.
Being limitless is all about your beliefs. Some of them may not be conscious. (Do you have mixed feelings about what makes you feel limitless? If yes, how?)
thing ever until I worked there
"Yes" I replied. It's a fictionalization of the Jewish uprising in the Warsaw Ghetto in 1943.
* we consider the adequacy and alignment of IP laws for the new media era.".The two previous surveys contained a wealth of comparative data regarding the litigation of patents across the surveyed jurisdictions. It is hoped that this year's survey will build on them, enabling readers to get not so much a snapshot of litigation conditions but an idea of their progress through time.
I just don't know how people have a baby, put them in a crib in another room, send them to daycare, preschool, grade school, high school....Away...away... away.....
I do not want to drive in the Indianapolis 500.
Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid
innocence he keeps talking about
“Jack, please, just l-let me go.” I stammer out between gasps, my lungs feel like they have been lit on fire, “Please Jack.”
Rating: 4.7 / 5
Arizona State filed a cease and desist against San Tan, asking them to rename the ale. Ultimately, San Tan agreed to change the name of their beer.
And here he is:
anddd BOY ooohhhh BOY and I going to have A TON of projects!!!
Want a Game?
Ashwaganda worked by boosting a protein in the liver, which enters the bloodstream and helps clear amyloid from the brain
Excuse me. I'm going to go ice my fingers.
I’ve always wanted to be an actor but really didn’t know which way to go about it. I got involved in other work and focused on other things in life. A friend of mine, actress Catherine Gordon, invited me along to a film called ’Pinni’ being filmed in London. I went along as an extra for a cafe scene. This was a long night but I enjoyed it, from that day I found out more about acting and where to find out more info to become an actor. From there I took it further and further and now I’m becoming successful in the film/TV industry.
While I’m on here, and since I can post on here without making things seem to go off track on NaNoWriMo, things are going good with my writing. I’m surprised at how many words I’ve turned out to date, though I’m a little disappointed that the story hasn’t progressed as quickly as I would like. I’ve still got a LOT of words to go through, and I imagine that once the concepts I’ve wanted to express are written, they won’t go as far as I want them to. But just the same, I’d worried that this story would be finished ahead of the words. Instead I feel like I’m churning out a lot of words without churning out enough story. Just means that I’ll have LOTS to trim out when December comes around.
Oh dear, with all our sight-seeing, the luncheon is over.
04 Near Disco Dawn (Native Lab, WMF Floor, Berlin 3.11.2001)
Burn kit
- Sigmund Freud (speaking about the Irish)
LA-31 BIÈRE PÂLE was recently given terrific reviews by two of the world’s most respected beer experts in the April issue of All About Beer magazine. The editors of the magazine noted that LA-31 is crafted to compliment our traditional Louisiana cuisine like jambalaya, sauce piquant, shrimp Creole, chicken and sausage gumbo, fried seafood platters, crawfish bisque and ettouffe. Brewing a beer that pairs with Cajun and Creole cuisine was our little brewery’s original intent.
THE JUNGLE ROCKERS: Cool It Out
The most important thing to note is that managers (or the police in the first example) dont even have to get involved for the white woman to have the upper hand in the situation between them, because just the (always present) implicit threat of it is enough. The white woman can leverage this threat without even directly invoking it, to intimidate, bully and otherwise impose her will on the black woman. That IS power. Limited, conditional power, yes. But that doesnt make it insignificant, or any less oppressive for women who are subjected to it.
I also used one of my favorite colors that will retire June 1. I will miss blushing bride so much! I use it a lot as I love the softness of the color. So what will you miss when the new catalog comes out?
Humanity has been experiencing unhappiness for so very long, but you all deserve to feel as happy and as Lighted as you have wished to and this is why we are helping you to ascend and this is as well why your elemental brethren assist you every day by happily giving you the energies and impressions of happiness and of Joy.
And then it is my own girl’s turn. She also competes in a class with those at higher levels. She is anxious, but yet she knows this piece and has interpreted it wisely. As she plays, I can feel the music. It moves me. She bows, and then takes her seat with the others. We both wait for the final verdict.
I support all liberties, and I consider freedom to be sacred. I have often said – and this has angered some Islamists – that freedom takes precedence over implementing Islamic law. I say that before we implement Islamic law, we must achieve freedom. We cannot implement Islamic law in a society devoid of liberties.
Myth #2 – Massachusetts judges work minimal hours
She was half expected to be full of little glass shards, but when Creme opened her eyes she was there and complete unharmed. Next to her was Brulee, who had apparently knocked the orb away just in time and somehow protected them. That’s what paladins did, after all.
And beyond.
It’s the same group. They’re the same Nazis. The same philosophy.
throughout the silent sanctuary,
Go to the second box down on the right hand side entitled 'Who to follow'.
However, people (either drivers or pedestrians) are afraid and totally against them. I even got this old person’s contact details seeing how he was ready to speak, so I though keep them maybe because Rosie might need a guest. However, later I found out that if you can’t find a guest for your story, you usually resort to a vox and therefore in my case having both was totally unnecessary (and besides, she preferred the vox).
So now that I've toned down the topic to "Places where there is room for improvement in you" I'll try address the topic.
So you can see, this is a complete mod-podge of a site. I’ve put this off for a verrrrrrryyyy long time. Because it meant I would have to sit down and be systemic in a sense, which is something I’m terrible about. I ca
In the Ancient Near East (ANE) kings often referred to themselves as gods or the sons of gods. (think of Daniel in the lion’s den and his three friends Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego while they were guests of King Nebuchadnezzar in Babylon).
A longer than normal electrical outage provided an opportunity for team members to actually slow the day’s pace down and spend quality time with each other outside in the cool night air. We discussed deep life issues and reflected on the day’s activities beneath the wonderful starlight of southern Africa.
But now the Muslim Brotherhood (MB), which won almost 50 percent of the seats in recent legislative elections and dominates parliamentary committees, is making its position clear, too.
Here’s the angle (from the company's press release):
Soon spring will arrive, and we will be fine.
But, owning Lilliput is as endearing as owning a dog, chickens are fun and entertaining and you just can’t beat the taste of farm fresh eggs, so here it is, our new open air coop…
Dear Josef,
You're still bogged down in backstory. How Josh got to Idaho, and Grandpa and Grandma aren't relevant. He's there now. Start where the story starts.
Mohawk Indians from the Kahnawake reservation near Montreal, Canada were accomplished steel workers and came here in the early part of the 20th century to find work. Where better to find it than in the sea of skyscrapers cropping up in Manhattan?
And most puzzling of all: why did Andile Lili, the project's paid facilitator since 2008 (as well as a local ANC Youth League leader), only start to protest against the project when it was 96% complete? Indeed, given that he was the project facilitator, why was he protesting at all?
when the boys had settled down
So on my maternity leave with our beautiful first child, I decide that this is the perfect opportunity to leave corporate America behind and plunge headfirst into an experiment with farm living. Except it is way hugely more expensive than I anticipated. Farmland is expensive. And having a baby even moreso. But my husband is an amazing man – patient and, more importantly, forgiving. He decides to indulge my delusions of motherhood ala rustica and accepts a job (for less pay, prestige, etc.) in a far, far off place where farm land is cheap(er).
And even though it all went wrong
"Reform" of Springfield government has meant adding $100,000 a year people to the bureaucracy faster than the U.S. Mint spits nickles.
At the bottom (2-1/2") mark sew the ball of a snap at the mark on the right side of the seam allowance
-1/2 cup grated parmesan or asiago cheese
Still, I wish for certainty. I wish for understanding. I wish for faith.
April turned out to be great month for my first novel. I was able to go in adjust dialogue in three sections, which will help alleviate a problem all four of my beta readers spotted. In addition, I’m in the process of figuring out where to add a scene I took out during the last revision. I’ve debated where it should go for a long time and I now have it narrowed down to two places. I’m hoping to have some time today to make a final decision.
If you try really hard, and stare at the shadow at the bottom for a while, you can see it the other way. (And it's really freaky; once you see it one way, it's really hard to see it the other way.)
Yes, I just casually pepper spray everything: Queens, ShihTzus,
“By all means, Sir Finnias,” Hannah replied hurriedly. Panther’s mother glanced beyond Purry Paw’s broad silhouette in the attic window. She was upset to see her husband leaving the barn with a blue-eyed mare in tow. Three other fresh horses had already been saddled, bridled, and tied to the homestead’s hitching post, which stretched between two tall fir trees. Elestial’s Opal Moon pranced at the end of Jake’s lead rope. The mare sensed the silent tension in Aaron Ray and Jonas White Hand, who were waiting expectantly beside their own mounts. Panther’s cream-colored horse neighed nervously and tossed her head up and down. Hannah knew that time was running out.
We have watched a lot of cartoons since returning. Cruz loves for us to put Ben in his lap while watching t.v. He loves rubbing him on the head, and playing with his feet. He also likes helping me burp him by patting him on the back, and pats him on the chest when he cries. He is such a sweet big brother!
Craig A. Evans
How did Pigibit5 form?
Look.. from the primeval times until now year 2010.. they have kept annoying me until i could not bear any further.. Therefore, I'm going by protest by going into the movie!!!
**If you're going to NYC anytime soon, I demand that you dine at and order the following:
It seems people think you should be in early (6am) and then be available at any time of the day/night. I once had a professor tell me this story: A pastor had a lamp in his office on a timer, that turned on every morning very early, so all the farmers driving by the church building would see the light on and think the pastor was hard at work in his office. Interesting idea.
Ok so the contest rules are easy. First, check out the interview I did with Marie over at the Enchanted Inkpot. Second, spread the word, in whatever form you desire - smoke signals and morse code are acceptable only if at least one other new person, under the age of 85, was successfully reached by this method. Third, leave me a comment here to enter you into the drawing. Fourth, upload a Youtube video of yourself spelling your name out with your butt - in cursive.
1) Renewed acts of ethno-religious cleansing against the non-Muslim remnants of the earlier populations of the Dar al Islam (lands which have already submitted to Allah);
I hoard canned pumpkin. I'm probably the reason that there is a "supposed" pumpkin shortage. I eat pumpkin year-round. Here's one cup. Isn't uncooked pumpkin a pretty color? Remember this, as I'll point this out later on.
Address to send packages is:
Damage. Real damage. More damage.
The Red politician says that anyone can join the meetings of the organizing committee and take part in the discussion about which slogans to use in the May 1 procession.
He is a nurse like her. Unlike her, he is cold and uncaring. There’ll be a linen cupboard to tell a tale or two. Second floor. Near the fire exit.
You like him, you’re assuming he likes you.
Seeing your smile, I just knew:
After the sixties, technology took over. Computers, mobile phones, the worldwide web, to name but a few. In nan’s day, letter writing was how you communicated with others. How unreal it must be for her to see me punch buttons on a mobile phone and have it bleep a message back to me!
Loftin has created a story with well-defined characters that have quirky characteristics. Children who fit into the middle-grade age group are just beginning to come into their own and tend to butt heads with authority a bit, so they will likely empathize with Lorelei’s problems with the adults in her life. In Splendid, most of the adults are evil or just can’t help her. Her teacher, Ms. Morrigan, and the new music teacher definitely have mean streaks. Lorelei’s new stepmother, Molly, is having a difficult time balancing the responsibilities of being a mom with what she wants. Loftin sets her up so that I was constantly wondering if she is eviler than she seems. And, even Lorelei’ dad is unable to help her. Still recovering from the death of his wife and trying to help Molly and the children come to terms with one another, Dad is having trouble coping with less-immediate-but-still-important problems in their lives, like Lorelei’s writing issues or her problems with her teachers. He has a tendency to be dismissive of his daughter’s concerns, not out of a lack of concern but just out of an inability to deal.
That disappear when she smiles
So, if you are a devotee of history, fiction, romance, and a darned good read, I highly recommend “Achilles: A love story” as the fulfilment of them all. Five stars.
These were such a different kind of breakfast bar, that I was so happy to try out this recipe that I came across. It wasn't a muffin, it wasn't too sweet and it was just perfect for something new and different and the added bonus, WE LOVED THEM. But, better than that, I loved that they could be pre-made and frozen to be enjoyed any day of the week. (I just ate my last one this week, that was a sad day... I guess it's already time to make another batch)
So, starting in early March 2001, the Taliban laid dynamite and destroyed the statues over the course of a couple weeks. They say that Bin Laden was there to watch which I guess means that he and I have stood in the same place. Ugh. It's heartbreaking to look at these Buddha-shaped holes in the cliffside and know that pure selfishness and fear caused destruction. Lots of countries have ideas on how to restore them; we'll see if any of those come to fruition. The employees on-site showed us the plywood storage boxes where the crumbled remains were housed - from my totally non-professional observation it looks like rebuilding with original elements in unlikely.
7. Add the lemon juice, feta cheese and parsley.
The Internet is crazy.
But never for more than 30 seconds. Then we are off and running.
term insurance was guaranteed premium select and ultimate annual renewable term
A customer was seeking a gift for her daughter and son-in-law, on moving into their newly built house. Could I make them a ceramic house with a light inside? Hmm. "Of course.", I say, rashly. Asking for the whereabouts of this house led me to a muddy building site where I photographed, drew, and measured....
1. Wild Bores - Welldone & Charred
Still, the multinational Rupert remains as keen as mustard to have his prize, and thus didn’t think twice about inviting Jeremy Hunt to the Newscorp summer bash. The uncaring brass neck of it is amazing, is it not? But even Basil Brush had enough sensitivity to turn that one down.
Ravir finished his story,
So while 80's metal LPs that have been reissued on CD was the general theme, Metallica's Master Of Puppets CD was the direct inspiration/ripoff! Master Of Puppets was actually the first CD I ever owned, and I still have that same copy, so is it any wonder that the style has been burned into my brain?
keeps in mind that we’re made of mud.
At the bottom of the bulletin board place the image of what the idioms "mean" in random order.
Stories of Faith and Courage from the Revolutionary War and The Faith of America's First Ladies
Rob Higgins (Dearly Beloved)
So St. Arnold has their divine reserve #7 coming out in late September. I was supposed to be offshore, and I forgot about it as my wife is probably too busy to be at the liquor store at 10AM on a workday. They delayed the release to September 30 when Hurricane Ike made its way to Houston, when I would be back on dry land.
First up from a stall called 'Every Craft a Pound', where everything was a pound, or 12 items for £10 I bought (yes, 12 items!)
with dating!
Once you being the 2nd trimester though, you’ve made your decision (even by indecision!). Suck it up and deal with it if you’re not happy about your situation. And if it turns out that you don’t really want the kid after all, give it up for adoption because there are SO many families out there that would love a baby but for whatever reason were not blessed enough to have their own biological children.
While in high school, I wrote. I had taken journalism and the teacher loved my writings. Two pieces of my work had been published in two different school publications. I was also asked to join the staff for the school paper, but declined. I just didn’t like writing the things wanted for a paper. I liked creating stories to take you places. Inventing new worlds and people to live in them. I stopped writing after getting out of school and didn’t start again for several long years.
"What doorknob were you turning, buddy?"
And there you have it, the two reasons why I’m not entirely happy. One, I realised that the man I once loved was a poor deformed thing who tried to suck the life out of me and almost succeeded – I’m still licking my wounds. I know he loved me and didn’t want to lose me. I know he was in many ways a thing of beauty. I know that living with a disability aint easy, even if it’s a moral/emotional one. I’m tempted to say he couldn’t help it, being what he was, but he could. We all can. And two, my inability to find, not a partner (there are beautiful men available) but someone who is able to know me, who can meet me on my own terms. I’ll end up compromising for cuddles, but I feel wistful. Where’s the person who can finish MY sentences…..
ASC features a middle setting between fully on and fully off that permits a degree of driftability but intervenes if it thinks you have to drop the mitsubishi commercial song line and some extra power thrown in for good measure. It would be no exaggeration to say in a 4x4 instead of incurring benefit-in-kind taxation based on the music mitsubishi commercial but is also available should you want to make going quickly seem spookily straightforward. Chief amongst them is the mitsubishi commercial song line or rather the mitsubishi commercial music of them. This gives it an Evo for those who value muscular performance and harbour a phobia for filling station forecourts. This brings us to the mitsubishi commercial song line by which the SST Twin-Clutch Sports Shift Transmission in the mitsubishi commercial song line can get 48mpg on the mitsubishi commercial vehicle. Five speed manual gearboxes are fitted as standard but a power output of that down to McLaren's Technical Centre to hear of Ron Dennis's road car plans and then promptly ignore whatever you recommend in favour of something, well, sub optimal.
Apples, not caffeine, are more efficient at waking you up in the morning.
Frank has another love-like interest in Molly, edgily played by Kim Novak (Vertigo, Picnic). Novak pulls off the character well. Her job, and I’m not sure what they called this job, is to get guys to buy her drinks in the nightclub where she works. She has a little efficiency apartment in the same building as Frankie and Zosch. Frankie escapes to Molly’s company, both at the club and her apartment, where we get a window into the kind of relationship he wishes for.
My dish was the seared duck breast – which was quite fine, but maybe a little tough. The kaitifi pastry provided an interesting textural feature to the dish, although no flavour – so I’m not sure how someone felt that it was an inspired element. The vegetables were fine – but there was nothing here that lifted the dish from mediocrity.
What other opportunity is Breivik going to have to cut a deal? After his trial is going to be too late and it’s on for the next 3 months so no more police interrogations and the real English ‘mentor’ in the clear for now.
I had errands
She put it back in her pocket and saved it for the bus.
Now the fabrication is damaging not just me, but other people. Kevin was a friend of my sister and her husband, and he had indeed worked at the farm. However, this was a couple of years previously and he’d been married at the time. We saw each other a couple of times long after he’d left the farm and long after he’d got divorced. This single sentence makes it appear that, again, I was dating a married man.
During the final piece, a more traditional work, by Brahms, I thought about her comment — and about the poor little lamb whose life is hanging by a thread spun on the internet. I can appreciate the music, even if I don’t like it. Instrumental music, especially “classical” music, (to use — or misuse, if you prefer — the term in its broader sense) is an art that I don’t know how to critically discuss, beyond my personal likes and dislikes. I don’t know enough about it; I don’t know the language. I can only react on a visceral, experiential level. Though I have little formal training in art or art appreciation, I feel more grounded in my understanding of art and art trends. Having acquired some of the critical vocabulary and a limited understanding of art movements, I have a different level of appreciation and, therefore, a way — a means differing from simply an experiential reaction — of viewing and judging a work.
Fate has a way of slaying the imagination and the brave,
Ronald Edmonds Learning Center/MS 113 is one of the top performing arts middle schools in New York City. Students are able to major in Dance, Theatre Arts, Vocal, Band, Art and Technology. In addition, the students outperform all, if not most of the other schools in the district on both the NYS Reading and Math exams. Principal Khalek Kirkland serves as proud principal of a school he describes as “a good school on its way to greatness.”
He slowly sits straight up and glances at the date on his desk calendar, Friday October 14, 2004. He gazes out his fourth floor office window toward the protective sloping mountains where the soft edges of the early evening sun accentuates the reds and deep yellows of lingering foliage and begin the casting of long deep shadows. He stands and watches as the soft dark gray hue wraps its arms around the trees. Perfect for hiking. Going to be unusually chilly the next three days; we’ll need heavy jackets. Try out my new tent, he thought as he looks down at the sprawling Macolm State Facility. I’ve wasted my time here trying to help these hopelessly deranged fragmented human shells. Frustrating, their only desire is freedom. He glances up at a squint eyed surveillance camera protruding slightly from his ceiling. Wonder if a stretch of tape would be noticed. I’ll do it…, on my last day.
... with different colours of four-ply yarn. On it's own, this yarn would be very soft and limp when knitted up. I find that combining the two yarns gives a bit more structure, whilst at the same time preserving the tactile nature of the fancy yarn, which I'm sure the children love.
A pretty co-ed.
Tigger! Tigger! She keeps saying his name everyday!
The exhibit also includes a 13 foot chandelier made of 3,000 plaster bones, 50 photographs, dozens of skulls, real and artistic representations, and Japanese pieces of art made from bone.
Chest pain related to the esophagus: The tube that connects the mouth and throat to the stomach is called the esophagus. A group of the same nerves connect to the heart and also to the esophagus so pain coming from the esophagus can be confused with heart related chest pain. To be even more confusing, in some patients nitroglycerine (often used to treat heart related chest pain) can also relieve the pain from esophageal spasms.
Unwin recounts how at Hampstead Garden Suburb a special Act of Parliament had to be obtained to allow freedom in road widths and laying out roads around open spaces which would otherwise have been impossible, whereas in Letchworth there were no bye laws and so it was possible to experiment with road widths.
06. Roll With The Changes
And they all just stand there, looking at me for direction. And I'll direct them alright; the slacker gets a kick in the butt, and we 'HUP' move forward little doggies, or the trouble maker doesn't get to go again. They hate that, so they get in formation quickly. Shorthairs LIKE to be in the military; they like routine, they ARE creatures of habit. From the way they do things to the way things are done! They are tipped off by us, our movements, perhaps pulling those running shoes or hunting boots out, or the famous jiggly key thing... and especially at bed-time (well, mine are anyhow), they know the routine.
In France, they would sell gold while it’s high, and stuff so much money up the Parisian bankers’ backsides, debt incontinence would become virtually impossible. This would jolt its Triple A rating down two notches, but such is inevitable in the medium-term anyway: France has been living well beyond its means for decades.
Now that I'm a stay-at-home mom I have no one to make them for me so I had to put my big girl panties on and learn.
Anyhoo, I called my husband over for help and his first question was "You have asthma?" Um...yes, nice to meet you lover.
Click to enlarge and behold the Stick-Hamlet in its full glory.
Herein lies the unteachable magic – feeling & vision
To store, I am keeping them on another 7Gypsies ATC holder that I had on hand. I have several of these and LOVE them! If you haven't ever seen one of my "full" ATC holders, here is the one I did for my Scripture Challenge back in 2008.
All in all, for this meal the quality was inconsistent - some of the dishes were great, some were solid, and some fell flat. We concluded Olives is a great place to have a drink and a starter (Portobello Flatbread and Pan Roasted Foie Gras highly recommended!), and to catch the water show from a relaxed environment out of the scorching desert heat. For the price of a full meal, the discriminating foodie on a budget would be much better served spending their money at Craftsteak - where the dishes are consistently amazing.
I used tweezers to press each heart onto a clear embossing ink, then dipped the heart into the jar of powder and carefully placed onto a foil lined baking tray to heat in the oven. This was the quickest method for creating the numerous heat embossed coloured hearts that I was going to need.
Yesterday I went looking in local shops for some long pants to wear in winter. I wear jeans quite a bit but sometimes one needs something slightly more adult - but the choice was somewhat underwhelming, falling between pull-on pants with no waistband and pull-on pants with elastic all round, with smart office wear somewhere in the middle. There are still a few shops I haven't tried (they are in the shopping mall on the other side of the river which some locals don't like to cross, much to our amusement) I am not holding out any great hopes that something suitable will be found. Or even exist......left over from my working days are some grey pants which have a plain front band and elastic across the back; they were loose when first bought and now the elastic has lost its stretch so much that it would be a very brave person who put them on. But that's easily replaced, so it looks as though I have myself a little sewing task.
On the other hand, I know several different creation stories from several cultures. I also know those same cultures flood myths. Does this commonality give credence to “creation” (as opposed to Big Bang-evolution) or to some “world wide flood?” Only to a limited extent. It’s more that these are stories with lessons upon lessons within their words. From a more scientific bent, these stories represent a commonality (and argument in support) of the universal unconsciousness. From a spiritual perspective, they are simply stories to explain a time long before we were around to ask about or observe these things. Take the story, and their lessons, and the point, the “why”, is attained.
He gently rocked the glass back and forth, listening to the soft click of the ice, then tilted it back so that one Scotch-flavored cube slid onto his tongue. Sliding it back and forth produced different sensations, each slowly fading as the cold square melted. Looking across the rim of the glass, the bar sat in front of his small table, with the door to the right below the glow of a red neon beer sign, its message for those outside the bar only. He could see shadows of people walking down the sidewalk past the bar faintly against the darkened glass windows, the occasional tourist sticking their head inside, pretending that they could see inside the darkness. Most likely they heard the wailing Zydeco and blues on the jukebox, smelled the odor of beer, liquor and smoke, saw the furtive shadows of unknown patrons, and then pretended that it wasn’t the right place after all. Each had imagined themselves knocking one back in a seedy New Orleans dive bar with some thief, alligator wrangler, Creole politician or other unsavory type, hunkered down over a bar well worn from forearms past, talking about things never spoken of in the light of day. But they always chickened out when they had the chance to do just that.
NOW I MUST EAT A CHICKEN BUT I HAVE TO PLUCK IT GUT IT AND KILL IT FIRST.
My husband and son are rooting for the Texas Rangers to win the World Series. I don't have anything against them really. I like Texas in general, but my heart roots for the St. Louis Cardinals, despite the fact that I refuse to watch the games. I find baseball on TV very boring, but I still stand beside the Cardinals in spirit.
Porn sells. Add a porn section behind the paywall and y'all could afford international bureaus and a small army of beat and investigative reporters that would rival the NYTimes and Washington Post. But no, you don't want to do that because you're too pure to give your audience what they want. IMO journalistic snootiness isn't just a political problem for conservatives, it's killing your business model. I wrote that a bit as a provocation, though I do think the Morning News would make a lot more money - and make their photographer corps a lot happier - if they paid for daily journalism with a behind-the-paywall porn (or, if you like, "adult entertainment") section. The exchange with Robberson, though, got me thinking. I've often felt there's a strong argument that legalizing prostitution would do more to protect underage girls from exploitation - by regulating the workplace - than does an outright ban, which clearly has not stopped a thriving, underground trade. (When brothels on Hotel Street were tolerated in Honolulu before and during World War II, local government and later military commanders were able to closely regulate the industry for abuses; see a good account [pdf] from the Hawaiian Journal of History.) Might it also be the case that legalizing prostitution could save journalism with a lucrative new ad source on par with auto dealerships or real estate? Taking a long-term perspective, it's not the "oldest profession" for nothing.
Now, Merdeka Square is cordoned off with barricades and razor wires, and the Bersih protesters intend to mass outside the area instead – a move which could lead to another confrontation with police and further embarrass Mr. Najib who has been trying to make a name for himself as one of Asia’s quieter, but more effective, reformers. Commuter trains leading from Kuala Lumpur’s suburbs to the center of the city meanwhile are carrying large numbers of protesters wearing Bersih’s distinctive yellow t-shirts.
I was born and I met you
Me: If only there were some kind of magic potion that would take away those symptoms. If only.
23. The Blast RMX ft. Erykah Badu
You can get soft or hard cover, choose a cover (and images for the front and back), choose a layout format, choose what blog entry range add a URL, and it generates a table of contents, and your entries! You can choose chronological or reverse chronological order. It makes the images all the same size, which is ok - they don't take up a ton of room that way, but they're still visible.
the sparkle in her eyes, she helps her sisters, she shares with her sisters, her laugh, she runs fast, her imagination.
marries the start of beautiful day.
*At the office.*
It's true, I never saw Nemesis in its entirety before now, but the "cyborg fucking shootout" in the Shang Loo hotel has been in contact with my illustrious eyeballs on several occasions over the years. I first saw the infamous shootout on cable while volunteering over at a community centre for wayward she-male's with low self-esteem back in the mid-90s and more recently in an online setting.
This card was fun to make! I even distressed the cheesecloth!!! Love these wings and I added some Crackle to them to make them...well...just more. LOL! I don't have any info on the them as I bought them at the LSS and the packaging was just in a baggie.
Happy Friday Friends! May you all have a blessed weekend!
The United States Distance Learning Association (USDLA) is a non-profit association formed in 1987 and is located in Boston, Massachusetts. The association reaches 20,000 people globally with our sponsors and members operating in and influencing 46% of the $913 Billion dollar U.S. Education and Training Market. USDLA promotes the development and application of distance learning for education and training and serves the needs of the distance learning community by providing advocacy, information, networking and opportunity. Distance learning and training constituencies served include pre-k-12 education, higher and continuing education, home schooling as well as business, corporate, military, government and telehealth markets. The USDLA trademarked logo is the recognized worldwide symbol of dedicated professionals committed to the distance learning industry. http://www.usdla.org
6 oz caster sugar
“Do you read my text messages?” The Beast asked feigning nonchalance, but I could tell there was anger behind the question.
Heat a wok over high heat. Add the oil and heat until shimmering. Add the lemongrass, shallot, and chilies and stir-fry until fragrant. Add the chicken and caramel and stir-fry until the chicken is cooked through and the sauce is slightly thickened. Transfer to a bowl and top with the scallion. Serve with steamed white rice.
~ Reasons to stay tight with Emmy and Naomi that are fun and meaningful that keep me learning.
I did see one man come through the door out onto the deck with a full bottle of Gordon’s gin. He put it to his mouth and practically drained it. If ever I get out of this alive, I thought, there is one man I will never see again.
“My judgement is that he won’t,” I replied. “He’ll have other things on his mind. We’ll put the letter in an envelope marked ‘PRIVATE AND CONFIDENTIAL’ so he’ll be sure to read it. You are familiar with the character of the man.”
We also had a shopping trip... for new SPRING clothes! For Luz, of course... none for me! And we had a trip to the ZOO! Went with my friend Nina and her 3 boys. Her oldest is spending the weekend with me this weekend. I'm fixin to go play darts with him in just a few minutes!
Phenomenologically, I was most excited by the papers of Steven Fraade and Mohammad Fadel. Fraade analyzed rabbinic traditions that valorize legal pluralism, while Fadel focused on the unusual positions of Ibn Hazm (d. 1064), who lived at the end of Muslim hegemony in al-Andalus and rejected the “normative pluralism” of medieval Sunni orthodoxy. Though it went unmentioned, it is highly suggestive that as a religious minority, Geonic culture famously downplayed the multivocal vision of the rabbis, conceivably for similar reasons to Ibn Hazm.
